one knew whether or how they could get it open again from the inside, and
the thought of being shut in a place from which the only way out led
through the dragon’s lair was not one they liked. Also everything seemed
quite quiet, both outside and down the tunnel. So for a longish while they
sat inside not far down from the half-open door and went on talking.
The talk turned to the dragon’s wicked words about the dwarves. Bilbo
wished he had never heard them, or at least that he could feel quite certain
that the dwarves now were absolutely honest when they declared that they
had never thought at all about what would happen after the treasure had
been won. “We knew it would be a desperate venture,” said Thorin, “and
we know that still; and I still think that when we have won it will be time
enough to think what to do about it. As for your share, Mr. Baggins, I
assure you we are more than grateful and you shall choose your own
fourteenth, as soon as we have anything to divide. I am sorry if you are
worried about transport, and I admit the difficulties are great—the lands
have not become less wild with the passing of time, rather the reverse—
but we will do whatever we can for you, and take our share of the cost
when the time comes. Believe me or not as you like!”
From that the talk turned to the great hoard itself and to the things that
Thorin and Balin remembered. They wondered if they were still lying
there unharmed in the hall below: the spears that were made for the armies
of the great King Bladorthin (long since dead), each had a thrice-forged
head and their shafts were inlaid with cunning gold, but they were never
delivered or paid for; shields made for warriors long dead; the great
golden cup of Thror, two-handed, hammered and carven with birds and
flowers whose eyes and petals were of jewels; coats of mail gilded and
silvered and impenetrable; the necklace of Girion, Lord of Dale, made of
five hundred emeralds green as grass, which he gave for the arming of his
eldest son in a coat of dwarf-linked rings the like of which had never been
made before, for it was wrought of pure silver to the power and strength of
triple steel. But fairest of all was the great white gem, which the dwarves
had found beneath the roots of the Mountain, the Heart of the Mountain,
the Arkenstone of Thrain.
“The Arkenstone! The Arkenstone!” murmured Thorin in the dark, half
dreaming with his chin upon his knees. “It was like a globe with a
thousand facets; it shone like silver in the firelight, like water in the sun,
like snow under the stars, like rain upon the Moon!”
But the enchanted desire of the hoard had fallen from Bilbo. All
through their talk he was only half listening to them. He sat nearest to the
door with one ear cocked for any beginnings of a sound without, his other
was alert for echoes beyond the murmurs of the dwarves, for any whisper
of a movement from far below.
Darkness grew deeper and he grew ever more uneasy. “Shut the door!”
he begged them, “I fear that dragon in my marrow. I like this silence far
less than the uproar of last night. Shut the door before it is too late!”
Something in his voice gave the dwarves an uncomfortable feeling.
Slowly Thorin shook off his dreams and getting up he kicked away the
stone that wedged the door. Then they thrust upon it, and it closed with a
snap and a clang. No trace of a keyhole was there left on the inside. They
were shut in the Mountain!
And not a moment too soon. They had hardly gone any distance down
the tunnel when a blow smote the side of the Mountain like the crash of
battering-rams made of forest oaks and swung by giants. The rock
boomed, the walls cracked and stones fell from the roof on their heads.
What would have happened if the door had still been open I don’t like to
think. They fled further down the tunnel glad to be still alive, while behind
them outside they heard the roar and rumble of Smaug’s fury. He was
breaking rocks to pieces, smashing wall and cliff with the lashings of his
huge tail, till their little lofty camping ground, the scorched grass, the
thrush’s stone, the snail-covered walls, the narrow ledge, and all
disappeared in a jumble of smithereens, and an avalanche of splintered
stones fell over the cliff into the valley below.
Smaug had left his lair in silent stealth, quietly soared into the air, and
then floated heavy and slow in the dark like a monstrous crow, down the
wind towards the west of the Mountain, in the hopes of catching unawares
something or somebody there, and of spying the outlet to the passage
which the thief had used. This was the outburst of his wrath when he could
find nobody and see nothing, even where he guessed the outlet must
actually be.
After he had let off his rage in this way he felt better and he thought in
his heart that he would not be troubled again from that direction. In the
meanwhile he had further vengeance to take. “Barrel-rider!” he snorted.
“Your feet came from the waterside and up the water you came without a
doubt. I don’t know your smell, but if you are not one of those men of the
Lake, you had their help. They shall see me and remember who is the real
King under the Mountain!”
He rose in fire and went away south towards the Running River.
Chapter XIII
NOT AT HOME
In the meanwhile, the dwarves sat in darkness, and utter silence fell about
them. Little they ate and little they spoke. They could not count the
passing of time; and they scarcely dared to move, for the whisper of their
voices echoed and rustled in the tunnel. If they dozed, they woke still to
darkness and to silence going on unbroken. At last after days and days of
waiting, as it seemed, when they were becoming choked and dazed for
want of air, they could bear it no longer. They would almost have
welcomed sounds from below of the dragon’s return. In the silence they
feared some cunning devilry of his, but they could not sit there for ever.
Thorin spoke: “Let us try the door!” he said. “I must feel the wind on
my face soon or die. I think I would rather be smashed by Smaug in the
open than suffocate in here!” So several of the dwarves got up and groped
back to where the door had been. But they found that the upper end of the
tunnel had been shattered and blocked with broken rock. Neither key nor
the magic it had once obeyed would ever open that door again.
“We are trapped!” they groaned. “This is the end. We shall die here.”
But somehow, just when the dwarves were most despairing, Bilbo felt a
strange lightening of the heart, as if a heavy weight had gone from under
his waistcoat.
“Come, come!” he said. “‘While there’s life there’s hope!’ as my father
used to say, and ‘Third time pays for all.’ I am going down the tunnel once
again. I have been that way twice, when I knew there was a dragon at the
other end, so I will risk a third visit when I am no longer sure. Anyway the
only way out is down. And I think this time you had better all come with
me.”
In desperation they agreed, and Thorin was the first to go forward by
Bilbo’s side.
“Now do be careful!” whispered the hobbit, “and as quiet as you can
be! There may be no Smaug at the bottom, but then again there may be.
Don’t let us take any unnecessary risks!”
Down, down they went. The dwarves could not, of course, compare
with the hobbit in real stealth, and they made a deal of puffing and
shuffling which echoes magnified alarmingly; but though every now and
again Bilbo in fear stopped and listened, not a sound stirred below. Near
the bottom, as well as he could judge, Bilbo slipped on his ring and went
ahead. But he did not need it: the darkness was complete, and they were all
invisible, ring or no ring. In fact so black was it that the hobbit came to the
opening unexpectedly, put his hand on air, stumbled forward, and rolled
headlong into the hall!
There he lay face downwards on the floor and did not dare to get up, or
hardly even to breathe. But nothing moved. There was not a gleam of light
—unless, as it seemed to him, when at last he slowly raised his head, there
was a pale white glint, above him and far off in the gloom. But certainly it
was not a spark of dragon-fire, though the worm-stench was heavy in the
place, and the taste of vapour was on his tongue.
At length Mr. Baggins could bear it no longer. “Confound you, Smaug,
you worm!” he squeaked aloud. “Stop playing hide-and-seek! Give me a
light, and then eat me, if you can catch me!”
Faint echoes ran round the unseen hall, but there was no answer.
Bilbo got up, and found that he did not know in what direction to turn.
“Now I wonder what on earth Smaug is playing at,” he said. “He is not
at home today (or tonight, or whatever it is), I do believe. If Oin and Gloin
have not lost their tinder-boxes, perhaps we can make a little light, and
have a look round before the luck turns.”
“Light!” he cried. “Can anybody make a light?”
The dwarves, of course, were very alarmed when Bilbo fell forward down
the step with a bump into the hall, and they sat huddled just where he had
left them at the end of the tunnel.
“Sh! sh!” they hissed, when they heard his voice; and though that
helped the hobbit to find out where they were, it was some time before he
could get anything else out of them. But in the end, when Bilbo actually
began to stamp on the floor, and screamed out “light!” at the top of his
shrill voice, Thorin gave way, and Oin and Gloin were sent back to their
bundles at the top of the tunnel.
After a while a twinkling gleam showed them returning, Oin with a
small pine-torch alight in his hand, and Gloin with a bundle of others
under his arm. Quickly Bilbo trotted to the door and took the torch; but he
could not persuade the dwarves to light the others or to come and join him
yet. As Thorin carefully explained, Mr. Baggins was still officially their
expert burglar and investigator. If he liked to risk a light, that was his
affair. They would wait in the tunnel for his report. So they sat near the
door and watched.
They saw the little dark shape of the hobbit start across the floor
holding his tiny light aloft. Every now and again, while he was still near
enough, they caught a glint and a tinkle as he stumbled on some golden
thing. The light grew smaller as he wandered away into the vast hall; then
it began to rise dancing into the air. Bilbo was climbing the great mound of
treasure. Soon he stood upon the top, and still went on. Then they saw him
halt and stoop for a moment; but they did not know the reason.
It was the Arkenstone, the Heart of the Mountain. So Bilbo guessed
from Thorin’s description; but indeed there could not be two such gems,
even in so marvellous a hoard, even in all the world. Ever as he climbed,
the same white gleam had shone before him and drawn his feet towards it.
Slowly it grew to a little globe of pallid light. Now as he came near, it was
tinged with a flickering sparkle of many colours at the surface, reflected
and splintered from the wavering light of his torch. At last he looked down
upon it, and he caught his breath. The great jewel shone before his feet of
its own inner light, and yet, cut and fashioned by the dwarves, who had
dug it from the heart of the mountain long ago, it took all light that fell
upon it and changed it into ten thousand sparks of white radiance shot with
glints of the rainbow.
Suddenly Bilbo’s arm went towards it drawn by its enchantment. His
small hand would not close about it, for it was a large and heavy gem; but
he lifted it, shut his eyes, and put it in his deepest pocket.
“Now I am a burglar indeed!” thought he. “But I suppose I must tell the
dwarves about it—some time. They did say I could pick and choose my
own share; and I think I would choose this, if they took all the rest!” All
the same he had an uncomfortable feeling that the picking and choosing
had not really been meant to include this marvellous gem, and that trouble
would yet come of it.
Now he went on again. Down the other side of the great mound he
climbed, and the spark of his torch vanished from the sight of the watching
dwarves. But soon they saw it far away in the distance again. Bilbo was
crossing the floor of the hall.
He went on, until he came to the great doors at the further side, and
there a draught of air refreshed him, but it almost puffed out his light. He
peeped timidly through, and caught a glimpse of great passages and of the
dim beginnings of wide stairs going up into the gloom. And still there was
no sight nor sound of Smaug. He was just going to turn and go back, when
a black shape swooped at him, and brushed his face. He squeaked and
started, stumbled backwards and fell. His torch dropped head downwards
and went out!
“Only a bat, I suppose and hope!” he said miserably. “But now what am
I to do? Which is East, South, North, or West?”
“Thorin! Balin! Oin! Gloin! Fili! Kili!” he cried as loud as he could—it
seemed a thin little noise in the wide blackness. “The light’s gone out!
Someone come and find me and help me!” For the moment his courage
had failed altogether.
Faintly the dwarves heard his small cries, though the only word they
could catch was “help!”
“Now what on earth or under it has happened?” said Thorin. “Certainly
not the dragon, or he would not go on squeaking.”
They waited a moment or two, and still there were no dragon-noises, no
sound at all in fact but Bilbo’s distant voice. “Come, one of you, get
another light or two!” Thorin ordered. “It seems we have got to go and
help our burglar.”
“It is about our turn to help,” said Balin, “and I am quite willing to go.
Anyway I expect it is safe for the moment.”
Gloin lit several more torches, and then they all crept out, one by one,
and went along the wall as hurriedly as they could. It was not long before
they met Bilbo himself coming back towards them. His wits had quickly
returned as soon as he saw the twinkle of their lights.
“Only a bat and a dropped torch, nothing worse!” he said in answer to
their questions. Though they were much relieved, they were inclined to be
grumpy at being frightened for nothing; but what they would have said, if
he had told them at that moment about the Arkenstone, I don’t know. The
mere fleeting glimpses of treasure which they had caught as they went
along had rekindled all the fire of their dwarvish hearts; and when the
heart of a dwarf, even the most respectable, is wakened by gold and by
jewels, he grows suddenly bold, and he may become fierce.
The dwarves indeed no longer needed any urging. All were now eager
to explore the hall while they had the chance, and willing to believe that,
for the present, Smaug was away from home. Each now gripped a lighted
torch; and as they gazed, first on one side and then on another, they forgot
fear and even caution. They spoke aloud, and cried out to one another, as
they lifted old treasures from the mound or from the wall and held them in
the light, caressing and fingering them.
Fili and Kili were almost in merry mood, and finding still hanging
there many golden harps strung with silver they took them and struck
them; and being magical (and also untouched by the dragon, who had
small interest in music) they were still in tune. The dark hall was filled
with a melody that had long been silent. But most of the dwarves were
more practical: they gathered gems and stuffed their pockets, and let what
they could not carry fall back through their fingers with a sigh. Thorin was
not least among these; but always he searched from side to side for
something which he could not find. It was the Arkenstone; but he spoke of
it yet to no one.
Now the dwarves took down mail and weapons from the walls, and
armed themselves. Royal indeed did Thorin look, clad in a coat of gold-
plated rings, with a silver-hafted axe in a belt crusted with scarlet stones.
“Mr. Baggins!” he cried. “Here is the first payment of your reward!
Cast off your old coat and put on this!”
With that he put on Bilbo a small coat of mail, wrought for some young
elf-prince long ago. It was of silver-steel, which the elves call mithril, and
with it went a belt of pearls and crystals. A light helm of figured leather,
strengthened beneath with hoops of steel, and studded about the brim with
white gems, was set upon the hobbit’s head.
“I feel magnificent,” he thought; “but I expect I look rather absurd.
How they would laugh on the Hill at home! Still I wish there was a
looking-glass handy!”
All the same Mr. Baggins kept his head more clear of the bewitchment
of the hoard than the dwarves did. Long before the dwarves were tired of
examining the treasures, he became weary of it and sat down on the floor;
and he began to wonder nervously what the end of it all would be. “I would
give a good many of these precious goblets,” he thought, “for a drink of
something cheering out of one of Beorn’s wooden bowls!”
“Thorin!” he cried aloud. “What next? We are armed, but what good
has any armour ever been before against Smaug the Dreadful? This
treasure is not yet won back. We are not looking for gold yet, but for a way
of escape; and we have tempted luck too long!”
“You speak the truth!” answered Thorin, recovering his wits. “Let us
go! I will guide you. Not in a thousand years should I forget the ways of
this palace.” Then he hailed the others, and they gathered together, and
holding their torches above their heads they passed through the gaping
doors, not without many a backward glance of longing.
Their glittering mail they had covered again with their old cloaks and
their bright helms with their tattered hoods, and one by one they walked
behind Thorin, a line of little lights in the darkness that halted often,
listening in fear once more for any rumour of the dragon’s coming.
Though all the old adornments were long mouldered or destroyed, and
though all was befouled and blasted with the comings and goings of the
monster, Thorin knew every passage and every turn. They climbed long
stairs, and turned and went down wide echoing ways, and turned again and
climbed yet more stairs, and yet more stairs again. These were smooth, cut
out of the living rock broad and fair; and up, up, the dwarves went, and
they met no sign of any living thing, only furtive shadows that fled from
the approach of their torches fluttering in the draughts.
The steps were not made, all the same, for hobbit-legs, and Bilbo was
just feeling that he could go on no longer, when suddenly the roof sprang
high and far beyond the reach of their torch-light. A white glimmer could
be seen coming through some opening far above, and the air smelt sweeter.
Before them light came dimly through great doors, that hung twisted on
their hinges and half burnt.
“This is the great chamber of Thror,” said Thorin; “the hall of feasting
and of council. Not far off now is the Front Gate.”
They passed through the ruined chamber. Tables were rotting there;
chairs and benches were lying there overturned, charred and decaying.
Skulls and bones were upon the floor among flagons and bowls and broken
drinking-horns and dust. As they came through yet more doors at the
further end, a sound of water fell upon their ears, and the grey light grew
suddenly more full.
“There is the birth of the Running River,” said Thorin. “From here it
hastens to the Gate. Let us follow it!”
Out of a dark opening in a wall of rock there issued a boiling water, and
it flowed swirling in a narrow channel, carved and made straight and deep
by the cunning of ancient hands. Beside it ran a stone-paved road, wide
enough for many men abreast. Swiftly along this they ran, and round a
wide-sweeping turn—and behold! before them stood the broad light of
day. In front there rose a tall arch, still showing the fragments of old
carven work within, worn and splintered and blackened though it was. A
misty sun sent its pale light between the arms of the Mountain, and beams
of gold fell on the pavement at the threshold.
A whirl of bats frightened from slumber by their smoking torches
flurried over them; as they sprang forward their feet slithered on stones
rubbed smooth and slimed by the passing of the dragon. Now before them
the water fell noisily outward and foamed down towards the valley. They
flung their pale torches to the ground, and stood gazing out with dazzled
eyes. They were come to the Front Gate, and were looking out upon Dale.
“Well!” said Bilbo, “I never expected to be looking out of this door.
And I never expected to be so pleased to see the sun again, and to feel the
wind on my face. But, ow! this wind is cold!”
It was. A bitter easterly breeze blew with a threat of oncoming winter.
It swirled over and round the arms of the Mountain into the valley, and
sighed among the rocks. After their long time in the stewing depths of the
dragon-haunted caverns, they shivered in the sun.
Suddenly Bilbo realized that he was not only tired but also very hungry
indeed. “It seems to be late morning,” he said, “and so I suppose it is more
or less breakfast-time—if there is any breakfast to have. But I don’t feel
that Smaug’s front doorstep is the safest place for a meal. Do let’s go
somewhere where we can sit quiet for a bit!”
“Quite right!” said Balin. “And I think I know which way we should go:
we ought to make for the old look-out post at the South-West corner of the
Mountain.”
“How far is that?” asked the hobbit.
“Five hours march, I should think. It will be rough going. The road
from the Gate along the left edge of the stream seems all broken up. But
look down there! The river loops suddenly east across Dale in front of the
ruined town. At that point there was once a bridge, leading to steep stairs
that climbed up the right bank, and so to a road running towards Ravenhill.
There is (or was) a path that left the road and climbed up to the post. A
hard climb, too, even if the old steps are still there.”
“Dear me!” grumbled the hobbit. “More walking and more climbing
without breakfast! I wonder how many breakfasts, and other meals, we
have missed inside that nasty clockless, timeless hole?”
As a matter of fact two nights and the day between had gone by (and
not altogether without food) since the dragon smashed the magic door, but
Bilbo had quite lost count, and it might have been one night or a week of
nights for all he could tell.
“Come, come!” said Thorin laughing—his spirits had begun to rise
again, and he rattled the precious stones in his pockets. “Don’t call my
palace a nasty hole! You wait till it has been cleaned and redecorated!”
“That won’t be till Smaug’s dead,” said Bilbo glumly. “In the
meanwhile where is he? I would give a good breakfast to know. I hope he
is not up on the Mountain looking down at us!”
That idea disturbed the dwarves mightily, and they quickly decided that
Bilbo and Balin were right.
“We must move away from here,” said Dori. “I feel as if his eyes were
on the back of my head.”
“It’s a cold lonesome place,” said Bombur. “There may be drink, but I
see no sign of food. A dragon would always be hungry in such parts.”
“Come on! Come on!” cried the others. “Let us follow Balin’s path!”
Under the rocky wall to the right there was no path, so on they trudged
among the stones on the left side of the river, and the emptiness and
desolation soon sobered even Thorin again. The bridge that Balin had
spoken of they found long fallen, and most of its stones were now only
boulders in the shallow noisy stream; but they forded the water without
much difficulty, and found the ancient steps, and climbed the high bank.
After going a short way they struck the old road, and before long came to a
deep dell sheltered among the rocks; there they rested for a while and had
such a breakfast as they could, chiefly cram and water. (If you want to
know what cram is, I can only say that I don’t know the recipe; but it is
biscuitish, keeps good indefinitely, is supposed to be sustaining, and is
certainly not entertaining, being in fact very uninteresting except as a
chewing exercise. It was made by the Lake-men for long journeys.)
After that they went on again; and now the road struck westwards and
left the river, and the great shoulder of the south-pointing mountain-spur
drew ever nearer. At length they reached the hill path. It scrambled steeply
up, and they plodded slowly one behind the other, till at last in the late
afternoon they came to the top of the ridge and saw the wintry sun going
downwards to the West.
Here they found a flat place without a wall on three sides, but backed to
the North by a rocky face in which there was an opening like a door. From
that door there was a wide view East and South and West.
“Here,” said Balin, “in the old days we used always to keep watchmen,
and that door behind leads into a rockhewn chamber that was made here as
a guardroom. There were several places like it round the Mountain. But
there seemed small need for watching in the days of our prosperity, and the
guards were made over comfortable, perhaps—otherwise we might have
had longer warning of the coming of the dragon, and things might have
been different. Still, here we can now lie hid and sheltered for a while, and
can see much without being seen.”
“Not much use, if we have been seen coming here,” said Dori, who was
always looking up towards the Mountain’s peak, as if he expected to see
Smaug perched there like a bird on a steeple.
“We must take our chance of that,” said Thorin. “We can go no further
to-day.”
“Hear, hear!” cried Bilbo, and flung himself on the ground.
In the rock-chamber there would have been room for a hundred, and
there was a small chamber further in, more removed from the cold outside.
It was quite deserted; not even wild animals seemed to have used it in all
the days of Smaug’s dominion. There they laid their burdens; and some
threw themselves down at once and slept, but the others sat near the outer
door and discussed their plans. In all their talk they came perpetually back
to one thing: where was Smaug? They looked West and there was nothing,
and East there was nothing, and in the South there was no sign of the
dragon, but there was a gathering of very many birds. At that they gazed
and wondered; but they were no nearer understanding it, when the first
cold stars came out.
Chapter XIV
FIRE AND WATER
Now if you wish, like the dwarves, to hear news of Smaug, you must go
back again to the evening when he smashed the door and flew off in rage,
two days before.
The men of the lake-town Esgaroth were mostly indoors, for the breeze
was from the black East and chill, but a few were walking on the quays,
and watching, as they were fond of doing, the stars shine out from the
smooth patches of the lake as they opened in the sky. From their town the
Lonely Mountain was mostly screened by the low hills at the far end of the
lake, through a gap in which the Running River came down from the
North. Only its high peak could they see in clear weather, and they looked
seldom at it, for it was ominous and drear even in the light of morning.
Now it was lost and gone, blotted in the dark.
Suddenly it flickered back to view; a brief glow touched it and faded.
“Look!” said one. “The lights again! Last night the watchmen saw them
start and fade from midnight until dawn. Something is happening up
there.”
“Perhaps the King under the Mountain is forging gold,” said another.
“It is long since he went North. It is time the songs began to prove
themselves again.”
“Which king?” said another with a grim voice. “As like as not it is the
marauding fire of the Dragon, the only king under the Mountain we have
ever known.”
“You are always foreboding gloomy things!” said the others. “Anything
from floods to poisoned fish. Think of something cheerful!”
Then suddenly a great light appeared in the low place in the hills and
the northern end of the lake turned golden. “The King beneath the
Mountain!” they shouted. “His wealth is like the Sun, his silver like a
fountain, his rivers golden run! The river is running gold from the
Mountain!” they cried, and everywhere windows were opening and feet
were hurrying.
There was once more a tremendous excitement and enthusiasm. But the
grim-voiced fellow ran hotfoot to the Master. “The dragon is coming or I
am a fool!” he cried. “Cut the bridges! To arms! To arms!”
Then warning trumpets were suddenly sounded, and echoed along the
rocky shores. The cheering stopped and the joy was turned to dread. So it
was that the dragon did not find them quite unprepared.
Before long, so great was his speed, they could see him as a spark of
fire rushing towards them and growing ever huger and more bright, and
not the most foolish doubted that the prophecies had gone rather wrong.
Still they had a little time. Every vessel in the town was filled with water,
every warrior was armed, every arrow and dart was ready, and the bridge
to the land was thrown down and destroyed, before the roar of Smaug’s
terrible approach grew loud, and the lake rippled red as fire beneath the
awful beating of his wings. Amid shrieks and wailing and the shouts of
men he came over them, swept towards the bridges and was foiled! The
bridge was gone, and his enemies were on an island in deep water—too
deep and dark and cool for his liking. If he plunged into it, a vapour and a
steam would arise enough to cover all the land with a mist for days; but
the lake was mightier than he, it would quench him before he could pass
through.
Roaring he swept back over the town. A hail of dark arrows leaped up
and snapped and rattled on his scales and jewels, and their shafts fell back
kindled by his breath burning and hissing into the lake. No fireworks you
ever imagined equalled the sights that night. At the twanging of the bows
and the shrilling of the trumpets the dragon’s wrath blazed to its height,
till he was blind and mad with it. No one had dared to give battle to him
for many an age; nor would they have dared now, if it had not been for the
grim-voiced man (Bard was his name), who ran to and fro cheering on the
archers and urging the Master to order them to fight to the last arrow.
Fire leaped from the dragon’s jaws. He circled for a while high in the
air above them lighting all the lake; the trees by the shores shone like
copper and like blood with leaping shadows of dense black at their feet.
Then down he swooped straight through the arrow-storm, reckless in his
rage, taking no heed to turn his scaly sides towards his foes, seeking only
to set their town ablaze.
Fire leaped from thatched roofs and wooden beam-ends as he hurtled
down and past and round again, though all had been drenched with water
before he came. Once more water was flung by a hundred hands wherever
a spark appeared. Back swirled the dragon. A sweep of his tail and the roof
of the Great House crumbled and smashed down. Flames unquenchable
sprang high into the night. Another swoop and another, and another house
and then another sprang afire and fell; and still no arrow hindered Smaug
or hurt him more than a fly from the marshes.
Already men were jumping into the water on every side. Women and
children were being huddled into laden boats in the market-pool. Weapons
were flung down. There was mourning and weeping, where but a little time
ago the old songs of mirth to come had been sung about the dwarves. Now
men cursed their names. The Master himself was turning to his great
gilded boat, hoping to row away in the confusion and save himself. Soon
all the town would be deserted and burned down to the surface of the lake.
That was the dragon’s hope. They could all get into boats for all he
cared. There he could have fine sport hunting them, or they could stop till
they starved. Let them try to get to land and he would be ready. Soon he
would set all the shoreland woods ablaze and wither every field and
pasture. Just now he was enjoying the sport of town-baiting more than he
had enjoyed anything for years.
But there was still a company of archers that held their ground among
the burning houses. Their captain was Bard, grim-voiced and grim-faced,
whose friends had accused him of prophesying floods and poisoned fish,
though they knew his worth and courage. He was a descendant in long line
of Girion, Lord of Dale, whose wife and child had escaped down the
Running River from the ruin long ago. Now he shot with a great yew bow,
till all his arrows but one were spent. The flames were near him. His
companions were leaving him. He bent his bow for the last time.
Suddenly out of the dark something fluttered to his shoulder. He started
—but it was only an old thrush. Unafraid it perched by his ear and it
brought him news. Marvelling he found he could understand its tongue, for
he was of the race of Dale.
“Wait! Wait!” it said to him. “The moon is rising. Look for the hollow
of the left breast as he flies and turns above you!” And while Bard paused
in wonder it told him of tidings up in the Mountain and of all that it had
heard.
Then Bard drew his bow-string to his ear. The dragon was circling back,
flying low, and as he came the moon rose above the eastern shore and
silvered his great wings.
“Arrow!” said the bowman. “Black arrow! I have saved you to the last.
You have never failed me and always I have recovered you. I had you from
my father and he from of old. If ever you came from the forges of the true
king under the Mountain, go now and speed well!”
The dragon swooped once more lower than ever, and as he turned and
dived down his belly glittered white with sparkling fires of gems in the
moon—but not in one place. The great bow twanged. The black arrow sped
straight from the string, straight for the hollow by the left breast where the
foreleg was flung wide. In it smote and vanished, barb, shaft and feather,
so fierce was its flight. With a shriek that deafened men, felled trees and
split stone, Smaug shot spouting into the air, turned over and crashed
down from on high in ruin.
Full on the town he fell. His last throes splintered it to sparks and
gledes. The lake roared in. A vast steam leaped up, white in the sudden
dark under the moon. There was a hiss, a gushing whirl, and then silence.
And that was the end of Smaug and Esgaroth, but not of Bard.
The waxing moon rose higher and higher and the wind grew loud and cold.
It twisted the white fog into bending pillars and hurrying clouds and drove
it off to the West to scatter in tattered shreds over the marshes before
Mirkwood. Then the many boats could be seen dotted dark on the surface
of the lake, and down the wind came the voices of the people of Esgaroth
lamenting their lost town and goods and ruined houses. But they had really
much to be thankful for, had they thought of it, though it could hardly be
expected that they should just then: three quarters of the people of the
town had at least escaped alive; their woods and fields and pastures and
cattle and most of their boats remained undamaged; and the dragon was
dead. What that meant they had not yet realized.
They gathered in mournful crowds upon the western shores, shivering
in the cold wind, and their first complaints and anger were against the
Master, who had left the town so soon, while some were still willing to
defend it.
“He may have a good head for business—especially his own business,”
some murmured, “but he is no good when anything serious happens!” And
they praised the courage of Bard and his last mighty shot. “If only he had
not been killed,” they all said, “we would make him a king. Bard the
Dragon-shooter of the line of Girion! Alas that he is lost!”
And in the very midst of their talk a tall figure stepped from the
shadows. He was drenched with water, his black hair hung wet over his
face and shoulders, and a fierce light was in his eyes.
“Bard is not lost!” he cried. “He dived from Esgaroth, when the enemy
was slain. I am Bard, of the line of Girion; I am the slayer of the dragon!”
“King Bard! King Bard!” they shouted; but the Master ground his
chattering teeth.
“Girion was lord of Dale, not king of Esgaroth,” he said. “In the Lake-
town we have always elected masters from among the old and wise, and
have not endured the rule of mere fighting men. Let ‘King Bard’ go back
to his own kingdom—Dale is now freed by his valour, and nothing hinders
his return. And any that wish can go with him, if they prefer the cold
stones under the shadow of the Mountain to the green shores of the lake.
The wise will stay here and hope to rebuild our town, and enjoy again in
time its peace and riches.”
“We will have King Bard!” the people near at hand shouted in reply.
“We have had enough of the old men and the money-counters!” And
people further off took up the cry: “Up the Bowman, and down with
Moneybags,” till the clamour echoed along the shore.
“I am the last man to undervalue Bard the Bowman,” said the Master
warily (for Bard now stood close beside him). “He has tonight earned an
eminent place in the roll of the benefactors of our town; and he is worthy
of many imperishable songs. But, why O People?”—and here the Master
rose to his feet and spoke very loud and clear—“Why do I get all your
blame? For what fault am I to be deposed? Who aroused the dragon from
his slumber, I might ask? Who obtained of us rich gifts and ample help,
and led us to believe that old songs could come true? Who played on our
soft hearts and our pleasant fancies? What sort of gold have they sent
down the river to reward us? Dragon-fire and ruin! From whom should we
claim the recompense of our damage, and aid for our widows and
orphans?”
As you see, the Master had not got his position for nothing. The result
of his words was that for the moment the people quite forgot their idea of
a new king, and turned their angry thoughts towards Thorin and his
company. Wild and bitter words were shouted from many sides; and some
of those who had before sung the old songs loudest, were now heard as
loudly crying that the dwarves had stirred the dragon up against them
deliberately!
“Fools!” said Bard. “Why waste words and wrath on those unhappy
creatures? Doubtless they perished first in fire, before Smaug came to us.”
Then even as he was speaking, the thought came into his heart of the
fabled treasure of the Mountain lying without guard or owner, and he fell
suddenly silent. He thought of the Master’s words, and of Dale rebuilt, and
filled with golden bells, if he could but find the men.
At length he spoke again: “This is no time for angry words, Master, or
for considering weighty plans of change. There is work to do. I serve you
still—though after a while I may think again of your words and go North
with any that will follow me.”
Then he strode off to help in the ordering of the camps and in the care
of the sick and the wounded. But the Master scowled at his back as he
went, and remained sitting on the ground. He thought much but said little,
unless it was to call loudly for men to bring him fire and food.
Now everywhere Bard went he found talk running like fire among the
people concerning the vast treasure that was now unguarded. Men spoke of
the recompense for all their harm that they would soon get from it, and
wealth over and to spare with which to buy rich things from the South; and
it cheered them greatly in their plight. That was as well, for the night was
bitter and miserable. Shelters could be contrived for few (the Master had
one) and there was little food (even the Master went short). Many took ill
of wet and cold and sorrow that night, and afterwards died, who had
escaped uninjured from the ruin of the town; and in the days that followed
there was much sickness and great hunger.
Meanwhile Bard took the lead, and ordered things as he wished, though
always in the Master’s name, and he had a hard task to govern the people
and direct the preparations for their protection and housing. Probably most
of them would have perished in the winter that now hurried after autumn,
if help had not been to hand. But help came swiftly; for Bard at once had
speedy messengers sent up the river to the Forest to ask the aid of the King
of the Elves of the Wood, and these messengers had found a host already
on the move, although it was then only the third day after the fall of
Smaug.
The Elvenking had received news from his own messengers and from
the birds that loved his folk, and already knew much of what had
happened. Very great indeed was the commotion among all things with
wings that dwelt on the borders of the Desolation of the Dragon. The air
was filled with circling flocks, and their swift-flying messengers flew here
and there across the sky. Above the borders of the Forest there was
whistling, crying and piping. Far over Mirkwood tidings spread: “Smaug
is dead!” Leaves rustled and startled ears were lifted. Even before the
Elvenking rode forth the news had passed west right to the pinewoods of
the Misty Mountains; Beorn had heard it in his wooden house, and the
goblins were at council in their caves.
“That will be the last we shall hear of Thorin Oakenshield, I fear,” said
the king. “He would have done better to have remained my guest. It is an
ill wind, all the same,” he added, “that blows no one any good.” For he too
had not forgotten the legend of the wealth of Thror. So it was that Bard’s
messengers found him now marching with many spearmen and bowmen;
and crows were gathered thick above him, for they thought that war was
awakening again, such as had not been in those parts for a long age.
But the king, when he received the prayers of Bard, had pity, for he was
the lord of a good and kindly people; so turning his march, which had at
first been direct towards the Mountain, he hastened now down the river to
the Long Lake. He had not boats or rafts enough for his host, and they
were forced to go the slower way by foot; but great store of goods he sent
ahead by water. Still elves are light-footed, and though they were not in
these days much used to the marches and the treacherous lands between
the Forest and the Lake, their going was swift. Only five days after the
death of the dragon they came upon the shores and looked on the ruins of
the town. Their welcome was good, as may be expected, and the men and
their Master were ready to make any bargain for the future in return for
the Elvenking’s aid.
Their plans were soon made. With the women and the children, the old
and the unfit, the Master remained behind; and with him were some men
of crafts and many skilled elves; and they busied themselves felling trees,
and collecting the timber sent down from the Forest. Then they set about
raising many huts by the shore against the oncoming winter; and also
under the Master’s direction they began the planning of a new town,
designed more fair and large even than before, but not in the same place.
They removed northward higher up the shore; for ever after they had a
dread of the water where the dragon lay. He would never again return to
his golden bed, but was stretched cold as stone, twisted upon the floor of
the shallows. There for ages his huge bones could be seen in calm weather
amid the ruined piles of the old town. But few dared to cross the cursed
spot, and none dared to dive into the shivering water or recover the
precious stones that fell from his rotting carcase.
But all the men of arms who were still able, and the most of the
Elvenking’s array, got ready to march north to the Mountain. It was thus
that in eleven days from the ruin of the town the head of their host passed
the rock-gates at the end of the lake and came into the desolate lands.
Chapter XV
THE GATHERING OF THE CLOUDS
Now we will return to Bilbo and the dwarves. All night one of them had
watched, but when morning came they had not heard or seen any sign of
danger. But ever more thickly the birds were gathering. Their companies
came flying from the South; and the crows that still lived about the
Mountain were wheeling and crying unceasingly above.
“Something strange is happening,” said Thorin. “The time has gone for
the autumn wanderings; and these are birds that dwell always in the land;
there are starlings and flocks of finches; and far off there are many carrion
birds as if a battle were afoot!”
Suddenly Bilbo pointed: “There is that old thrush again!” he cried. “He
seems to have escaped, when Smaug smashed the mountain-side, but I
don’t suppose the snails have!”
Sure enough the old thrush was there, and as Bilbo pointed, he flew
towards them and perched on a stone near by. Then he fluttered his wings
and sang; then he cocked his head on one side, as if to listen; and again he
sang, and again he listened.
“I believe he is trying to tell us something,” said Balin; “but I cannot
follow the speech of such birds, it is very quick and difficult. Can you
make it out Baggins?”
“Not very well,” said Bilbo (as a matter of fact, he could make nothing
of it at all); “but the old fellow seems very excited.”
“I only wish he was a raven!” said Balin.
“I thought you did not like them! You seemed very shy of them, when
we came this way before.”
“Those were crows! And nasty suspicious-looking creatures at that, and
rude as well. You must have heard the ugly names they were calling after
us. But the ravens are different. There used to be great friendship between
them and the people of Thror; and they often brought us secret news, and
were rewarded with such bright things as they coveted to hide in their
dwellings.
“They live many a year, and their memories are long, and they hand on
their wisdom to their children. I knew many among the ravens of the rocks
when I was a dwarf-lad. This very height was once named Ravenhill,
because there was a wise and famous pair, old Carc and his wife, that lived
here above the guard-chamber. But I don’t suppose that any of that ancient
breed linger here now.”
No sooner had he finished speaking than the old thrush gave a loud call,
and immediately flew away.
“We may not understand him, but that old bird understands us, I am
sure,” said Balin. “Keep watch now, and see what happens!”
Before long there was a fluttering of wings, and back came the thrush;
and with him came a most decrepit old bird. He was getting blind, he
could hardly fly, and the top of his head was bald. He was an aged raven of
great size. He alighted stiffly on the ground before them, slowly flapped
his wings, and bobbed towards Thorin.
“O Thorin son of Thrain, and Balin son of Fundin,” he croaked (and
Bilbo could understand what he said, for he used ordinary language and
not bird-speech). “I am Roäc son of Carc. Carc is dead, but he was well
known to you once. It is a hundred years and three and fifty since I came
out of the egg, but I do not forget what my father told me. Now I am the
chief of the great ravens of the Mountain. We are few, but we remember
still the king that was of old. Most of my people are abroad, for there are
great tidings in the South—some are tidings of joy to you, and some you
will not think so good.
“Behold! the birds are gathering back again to the Mountain and to
Dale from South and East and West, for word has gone out that Smaug is
dead!”
“Dead! Dead?” shouted the dwarves. “Dead! Then we have been in
needless fear—and the treasure is ours!” They all sprang up and began to
caper about for joy.
“Yes, dead,” said Roäc. “The thrush, may his feathers never fall, saw
him die, and we may trust his words. He saw him fall in battle with the
men of Esgaroth the third night back from now at the rising of the moon.”
It was some time before Thorin could bring the dwarves to be silent
and listen to the raven’s news. At length when he had told all the tale of
the battle he went on:
“So much for joy, Thorin Oakenshield. You may go back to your halls
in safety; all the treasure is yours—for the moment. But many are
gathering hither beside the birds. The news of the death of the guardian
has already gone far and wide, and the legend of the wealth of Thror has
not lost in the telling during many years; many are eager for a share of the
spoil. Already a host of the elves is on the way, and carrion birds are with
them hoping for battle and slaughter. By the lake men murmur that their
sorrows are due to the dwarves; for they are homeless and many have died,
and Smaug has destroyed their town. They too think to find amends from
your treasure, whether you are alive or dead.
“Your own wisdom must decide your course; but thirteen is small
remnant of the great folk of Durin that once dwelt here, and now are
scattered far. If you will listen to my counsel, you will not trust the Master
of the Lake-men, but rather him that shot the dragon with his bow. Bard is
he, of the race of Dale, of the line of Girion; he is a grim man but true. We
would see peace once more among dwarves and men and elves after the
long desolation; but it may cost you dear in gold. I have spoken.”
Then Thorin burst forth in anger: “Our thanks, Roäc Carc’s son. You
and your people shall not be forgotten. But none of our gold shall thieves
take or the violent carry off while we are alive. If you would earn our
thanks still more, bring us news of any that draw near. Also I would beg of
you, if any of you are still young and strong of wing, that you would send
messengers to our kin in the mountains of the North, both west from here
and east, and tell them of our plight. But go specially to my cousin Dain in
the Iron Hills, for he has many people well-armed, and dwells nearest to
this place. Bid him hasten!”
“I will not say if this counsel be good or bad,” croaked Roäc, “but I will
do what can be done.” Then off he slowly flew.
“Back now to the Mountain!” cried Thorin. “We have little time to
lose.”
“And little food to use!” cried Bilbo, always practical on such points.
In any case he felt that the adventure was, properly speaking, over with the
death of the dragon—in which he was much mistaken—and he would have
given most of his share of the profits for the peaceful winding up of these
affairs.
“Back to the Mountain!” cried the dwarves as if they had not heard
him; so back he had to go with them.
As you have heard some of the events already, you will see that the
dwarves still had some days before them. They explored the caverns once
more, and found, as they expected, that only the Front Gate remained
open; all the other gates (except, of course, the small secret door) had long
ago been broken and blocked by Smaug, and no sign of them remained. So
now they began to labour hard in fortifying the main entrance, and in
making a new path that led from it. Tools were to be found in plenty that
the miners and quarriers and builders of old had used; and at such work the
dwarves were still very skilled.
As they worked the ravens brought them constant tidings. In this way
they learned that the Elvenking had turned aside to the Lake, and they still
had a breathing space. Better still, they heard that three of their ponies had
escaped and were wandering wild far down the banks of the Running
River, not far from where the rest of their stores had been left. So while
the others went on with their work, Fili and Kili were sent, guided by a
raven, to find the ponies and bring back all they could.
They were four days gone, and by that time they knew that the joined
armies of the Lake-men and the Elves were hurrying toward the Mountain.
But now their hopes were higher; for they had food for some weeks with
care—chiefly cram, of course, and they were very tired of it; but cram is
much better than nothing—and already the gate was blocked with a wall of
squared stones laid dry, but very thick and high, across the opening. There
were holes in the wall through which they could see (or shoot), but no
entrance. They climbed in or out with ladders, and hauled stuff up with
ropes. For the issuing of the stream they had contrived a small low arch
under the new wall; but near the entrance they had so altered the narrow
bed that a wide pool stretched from the mountain-wall to the head of the
fall over which the stream went towards Dale. Approach to the Gate was
now only possible, without swimming, along a narrow ledge of the cliff, to
the right as one looked outwards from the wall. The ponies they had
brought only to the head of the steps above the old bridge, and unloading
them there had bidden them return to their masters and sent them back
riderless to the South.
There came a night when suddenly there were many lights as of fires and
torches away south in Dale before them.
“They have come!” called Balin. “And their camp is very great. They
must have come into the valley under the cover of dusk along both banks
of the river.”
That night the dwarves slept little. The morning was still pale when
they saw a company approaching. From behind their wall they watched
them come up to the valley’s head and climb slowly up. Before long they
could see that both men of the lake armed as if for war and elvish bowmen
were among them. At length the foremost of these climbed the tumbled
rocks and appeared at the top of the falls; and very great was their surprise
to see the pool before them and the Gate blocked with a wall of new-hewn
stone.
As they stood pointing and speaking to one another Thorin hailed them:
“Who are you,” he called in a very loud voice, “that come as if in war to
the gates of Thorin son of Thrain, King under the Mountain, and what do
you desire?”
But they answered nothing. Some turned swiftly back, and the others
after gazing for a while at the Gate and its defences soon followed them.
That day the camp was moved to the east of the river, right between the
arms of the Mountain. The rocks echoed then with voices and with song,
as they had not done for many a day. There was the sound, too, of elven-
harps and of sweet music; and as it echoed up towards them it seemed that
the chill of the air was warmed, and they caught faintly the fragrance of
woodland flowers blossoming in spring.
Then Bilbo longed to escape from the dark fortress and to go down and
join in the mirth and feasting by the fires. Some of the younger dwarves
were moved in their hearts, too, and they muttered that they wished things
had fallen out otherwise and that they might welcome such folk as friends;
but Thorin scowled.
Then the dwarves themselves brought forth harps and instruments
regained from the hoard, and made music to soften his mood; but their
song was not as elvish song, and was much like the song they had sung
long before in Bilbo’s little hobbit-hole.
Under the Mountain dark and tall
The King has come unto his hall!
His foe is dead, the Worm of Dread,
And ever so his foes shall fall.
The sword is sharp, the spear is long,
The arrow swift, the Gate is strong;
The heart is bold that looks on gold;
The dwarves no more shall suffer wrong.
The dwarves of yore made mighty spells,
While hammers fell like ringing bells
In places deep, where dark things sleep,
In hollow halls beneath the fells.
On silver necklaces they strung
The light of stars, on crowns they hung
The dragon-fire, from twisted wire
The melody of harps they wrung.
The mountain throne once more is freed!
O! wandering folk, the summons heed! Come haste!
Come haste! across the waste!
The king of friend and kin has need.
Now call we over mountains cold,
‘Come back unto the caverns old’!
Here at the Gates the king awaits,
His hands are rich with gems and gold.
The king is come unto his hall
Under the Mountain dark and tall.
The Worm of Dread is slain and dead,
And ever so our foes shall fall!
This song appeared to please Thorin, and he smiled again and grew
merry; and he began reckoning the distance to the Iron Hills and how long
it would be before Dain could reach the Lonely Mountain, if he had set out
as soon as the message reached him. But Bilbo’s heart fell, both at the
song and the talk: they sounded much too warlike.
The next morning early a company of spearmen was seen crossing the
river, and marching up the valley. They bore with them the green banner of
the Elvenking and the blue banner of the Lake, and they advanced until
they stood right before the wall at the Gate.
Again Thorin hailed them in a loud voice: “Who are you that come
armed for war to the gates of Thorin son of Thrain, King under the
Mountain?” This time he was answered.
A tall man stood forward, dark of hair and grim of face, and he cried:
“Hail Thorin! Why do you fence yourself like a robber in his hold? We are
not yet foes, and we rejoice that you are alive beyond our hope. We came
expecting to find none living here; yet now that we are met there is matter
for a parley and a council.”
“Who are you, and of what would you parley?”
“I am Bard, and by my hand was the dragon slain and your treasure
delivered. Is that not a matter that concerns you? Moreover I am by right
descent the heir of Girion of Dale, and in your hoard is mingled much of
the wealth of his halls and towns, which of old Smaug stole. Is not that a
matter of which we may speak? Further in his last battle Smaug destroyed
the dwellings of the men of Esgaroth, and I am yet the servant of their
Master. I would speak for him and ask whether you have no thought for the
sorrow and misery of his people. They aided you in your distress, and in
recompense you have thus far brought ruin only, though doubtless
undesigned.”
Now these were fair words and true, if proudly and grimly spoken; and
Bilbo thought that Thorin would at once admit what justice was in them.
He did not, of course, expect that any one would remember that it was he
who discovered all by himself the dragon’s weak spot; and that was just as
well, for no one ever did. But also he did not reckon with the power that
gold has upon which a dragon has long brooded, nor with dwarvish hearts.
Long hours in the past days Thorin had spent in the treasury, and the lust
of it was heavy on him. Though he had hunted chiefly for the Arkenstone,
yet he had an eye for many another wonderful thing that was lying there,
about which were wound old memories of the labours and the sorrows of
his race.
“You put your worst cause last and in the chief place,” Thorin
answered. “To the treasure of my people no man has a claim, because
Smaug who stole it from us also robbed him of life or home. The treasure
was not his that his evil deeds should be amended with a share of it. The
price of the goods and the assistance that we received of the Lake-men we
will fairly pay—in due time. But nothing will we give, not even a loaf ’s
worth, under threat of force. While an armed host lies before our doors, we
look on you as foes and thieves.
“It is in my mind to ask what share of their inheritance you would have
paid to our kindred, had you found the hoard unguarded and us slain.”
“A just question,” replied Bard. “But you are not dead, and we are not
robbers. Moreover the wealthy may have pity beyond right on the needy
that befriended them when they were in want. And still my other claims
remain unanswered.”
“I will not parley, as I have said, with armed men at my gate. Nor at all
with the people of the Elvenking, whom I remember with small kindness.
In this debate they have no place. Begone now ere our arrows fly! And if
you would speak with me again, first dismiss the elvish host to the woods
where it belongs, and then return, laying down your arms before you
approach the threshold.”
“The Elvenking is my friend, and he has succoured the people of the
Lake in their need, though they had no claim but friendship on him,”
answered Bard. “We will give you time to repent your words. Gather your
wisdom ere we return!” Then he departed and went back to the camp.
Ere many hours were past, the banner-bearers returned, and trumpeters
stood forth and blew a blast:
“In the name of Esgaroth and the Forest,” one cried, “we speak unto
Thorin Thrain’s son Oakenshield, calling himself the King under the
Mountain, and we bid him consider well the claims that have been urged,
or be declared our foe. At the least he shall deliver one twelfth portion of
the treasure unto Bard, as the dragon-slayer, and as the heir of Girion.
From that portion Bard will himself contribute to the aid of Esgaroth; but
if Thorin would have the friendship and honour of the lands about, as his
sires had of old, then he will give also somewhat of his own for the
comfort of the men of the Lake.”
Then Thorin seized a bow of horn and shot an arrow at the speaker. It
smote into his shield and stuck there quivering.
“Since such is your answer,” he called in return, “I declare the
Mountain besieged. You shall not depart from it, until you call on your
side for a truce and a parley. We will bear no weapons against you, but we
leave you to your gold. You may eat that, if you will!”
With that the messengers departed swiftly, and the dwarves were left to
consider their case. So grim had Thorin become, that even if they had
wished, the others would not have dared to find fault with him; but indeed
most of them seemed to share his mind—except perhaps old fat Bombur
and Fili and Kili. Bilbo, of course, disapproved of the whole turn of
affairs. He had by now had more than enough of the Mountain, and being
besieged inside it was not at all to his taste.
“The whole place still stinks of dragon,” he grumbled to himself, “and
it makes me sick. And cram is beginning simply to stick in my throat.”
Chapter XVI
A THIEF IN THE NIGHT
Now the days passed slowly and wearily. Many of the dwarves spent their
time piling and ordering the treasure; and now Thorin spoke of the
Arkenstone of Thrain, and bade them eagerly to look for it in every corner.
“For the Arkenstone of my father,” he said, “is worth more than a river
of gold in itself, and to me it is beyond price. That stone of all the treasure
I name unto myself, and I will be avenged on anyone who finds it and
withholds it.”
Bilbo heard these words and he grew afraid, wondering what would
happen, if the stone was found—wrapped in an old bundle of tattered
oddments that he used as a pillow. All the same he did not speak of it, for
as the weariness of the days grew heavier, the beginnings of a plan had
come into his little head.
Things had gone on like this for some time, when the ravens brought
news that Dain and more than five hundred dwarves, hurrying from the
Iron Hills, were now within about two days’ march of Dale, coming from
the North-East.
“But they cannot reach the Mountain unmarked,” said Roäc, “and I fear
lest there be battle in the valley. I do not call this counsel good. Though
they are a grim folk, they are not likely to overcome the host that besets
you; and even if they did so, what will you gain? Winter and snow is
hastening behind them. How shall you be fed without the friendship and
goodwill of the lands about you? The treasure is likely to be your death,
though the dragon is no more!”
But Thorin was not moved. “Winter and snow will bite both men and
elves,” he said, “and they may find their dwelling in the waste grievous to
bear. With my friends behind them and winter upon them, they will
perhaps be in softer mood to parley with.”
That night Bilbo made up his mind. The sky was black and moonless.
As soon as it was full dark, he went to a corner of an inner chamber just
within the gate and drew from his bundle a rope, and also the Arkenstone
wrapped in a rag. Then he climbed to the top of the wall. Only Bombur
was there, for it was his turn to watch, and the dwarves kept only one
watchman at a time.
“It is mighty cold!” said Bombur. “I wish we could have a fire up here
as they have in the camp!”
“It is warm enough inside,” said Bilbo.
“I daresay; but I am bound here till midnight,” grumbled the fat dwarf.
“A sorry business altogether. Not that I venture to disagree with Thorin,
may his beard grow ever longer; yet he was ever a dwarf with a stiff neck.”
“Not as stiff as my legs,” said Bilbo. “I am tired of stairs and stone
passages. I would give a good deal for the feel of grass at my toes.”
“I would give a good deal for the feel of a strong drink in my throat,
and for a soft bed after a good supper!”
“I can’t give you those, while the siege is going on.
But it is long since I watched, and I will take your turn for you, if you
like. There is no sleep in me tonight.”
“You are a good fellow, Mr. Baggins, and I will take your offer kindly.
If there should be anything to note, rouse me first, mind you! I will lie in
the inner chamber to the left, not far away.”
“Off you go!” said Bilbo. “I will wake you at midnight, and you can
wake the next watchman.”
As soon as Bombur had gone, Bilbo put on his ring, fastened his rope,
slipped down over the wall, and was gone. He had about five hours before
him. Bombur would sleep (he could sleep at any time, and ever since the
adventure in the forest he was always trying to recapture the beautiful
dreams he had then); and all the others were busy with Thorin. It was
unlikely that any, even Fili or Kili, would come out on the wall until it was
their turn.
It was very dark, and the road after a while, when he left the newly
made path and climbed down towards the lower course of the stream, was
strange to him. At last he came to the bend where he had to cross the
water, if he was to make for the camp, as he wished. The bed of the stream
was there shallow but already broad, and fording it in the dark was not
easy for the little hobbit. He was nearly across when he missed his footing
on a round stone and fell into the cold water with a splash. He had barely
scrambled out on the far bank, shivering and spluttering, when up came
elves in the gloom with bright lanterns and searched for the cause of the
noise.
“That was no fish!” one said. “There is a spy about. Hide your lights!
They will help him more than us, if it is that queer little creature that is
said to be their servant.”
“Servant, indeed!” snorted Bilbo; and in the middle of his snort he
sneezed loudly, and the elves immediately gathered towards the sound.
“Let’s have a light!” he said. “I am here, if you want me!” and he
slipped off his ring, and popped from behind a rock.
They seized him quickly, in spite of their surprise. “Who are you? Are
you the dwarves’ hobbit? What are you doing? How did you get so far past
our sentinels?” they asked one after another.
“I am Mr. Bilbo Baggins,” he answered, “companion of Thorin, if you
want to know. I know your king well by sight, though perhaps he doesn’t
know me to look at. But Bard will remember me, and it is Bard I
particularly want to see.”
“Indeed!” said they, “and what may be your business?”
“Whatever it is, it’s my own, my good elves. But if you wish ever to get
back to your own woods from this cold cheerless place,” he answered
shivering, “you will take me along quick to a fire, where I can dry—and
then you will let me speak to your chiefs as quick as may be. I have only
an hour or two to spare.”
That is how it came about that some two hours after his escape from the
Gate, Bilbo was sitting beside a warm fire in front of a large tent, and
there sat too, gazing curiously at him, both the Elvenking and Bard. A
hobbit in elvish armour, partly wrapped in an old blanket, was something
new to them.
“Really you know,” Bilbo was saying in his best business manner,
“things are impossible. Personally I am tired of the whole affair. I wish I
was back in the West in my own home, where folk are more reasonable.
But I have an interest in this matter—one fourteenth share, to be precise,
according to a letter, which fortunately I believe I have kept.” He drew
from a pocket in his old jacket (which he still wore over his mail),
crumpled and much folded, Thorin’s letter that had been put under the
clock on his mantelpiece in May!
“A share in the profits, mind you,” he went on. “I am aware of that.
Personally I am only too ready to consider all your claims carefully, and
deduct what is right from the total before putting in my own claim.
However you don’t know Thorin Oakenshield as well as I do now. I assure
you, he is quite ready to sit on a heap of gold and starve, as long as you sit
here.”
“Well, let him!” said Bard. “Such a fool deserves to starve.”
“Quite so,” said Bilbo. “I see your point of view. At the same time
winter is coming on fast. Before long you will be having snow and what
not, and supplies will be difficult—even for elves I imagine. Also there
will be other difficulties. You have not heard of Dain and the dwarves of
the Iron Hills?”
“We have, a long time ago; but what has he got to do with us?” asked
the king.
“I thought as much. I see I have some information you have not got.
Dain, I may tell you, is now less than two days’ march off, and has at least
five hundred grim dwarves with him—a good many of them have had
experience in the dreadful dwarf and goblin wars, of which you have no
doubt heard. When they arrive there may be serious trouble.”
“Why do you tell us this? Are you betraying your friends, or are you
threatening us?” asked Bard grimly.
“My dear Bard!” squeaked Bilbo. “Don’t be so hasty! I never met such
suspicious folk! I am merely trying to avoid trouble for all concerned.
Now I will make you an offer! !”
“Let us hear it!” they said.
“You may see it!” said he. “It is this!” and he drew forth the
Arkenstone, and threw away the wrapping.
The Elvenking himself, whose eyes were used to things of wonder and
beauty, stood up in amazement. Even Bard gazed marvelling at it in
silence. It was as if a globe had been filled with moonlight and hung
before them in a net woven of the glint of frosty stars.
“This is the Arkenstone of Thrain,” said Bilbo, “the Heart of the
Mountain; and it is also the heart of Thorin. He values it above a river of
gold. I give it to you. It will aid you in your bargaining.” Then Bilbo, not
without a shudder, not without a glance of longing, handed the marvellous
stone to Bard, and he held it in his hand, as though dazed.
“But how is it yours to give?” he asked at last with an effort.
“O well!” said the hobbit uncomfortably. “It isn’t exactly; but, well, I
am willing to let it stand against all my claim, don’t you know. I may be a
burglar—or so they say: personally I never really felt like one—but I am
an honest one, I hope, more or less. Anyway I am going back now, and the
dwarves can do what they like to me. I hope you will find it useful.”
The Elvenking looked at Bilbo with a new wonder. “Bilbo Baggins!” he
said. “You are more worthy to wear the armour of elf-princes than many
that have looked more comely in it. But I wonder if Thorin Oakenshield
will see it so. I have more knowledge of dwarves in general than you have
perhaps. I advise you to remain with us, and here you shall be honoured
and thrice welcome.”
“Thank you very much I am sure,” said Bilbo with a bow. “But I don’t
think I ought to leave my friends like this, after all we have gone through
together. And I promised to wake old Bombur at midnight, too! Really I
must be going, and quickly.”
Nothing they could say would stop him; so an escort was provided for
him, and as he went both the king and Bard saluted him with honour. As
they passed through the camp an old man, wrapped in a dark cloak, rose
from a tent door where he was sitting and came towards them.
“Well done! Mr. Baggins!” he said, clapping Bilbo on the back. “There
is always more about you than anyone expects!” It was Gandalf.
For the first time for many a day Bilbo was really delighted. But there
was no time for all the questions that he immediately wished to ask.
“All in good time!” said Gandalf. “Things are drawing towards the end
now, unless I am mistaken. There is an unpleasant time just in front of
you; but keep your heart up! You may come through all right. There is
news brewing that even the ravens have not heard. Good night!”
Puzzled but cheered, Bilbo hurried on. He was guided to a safe ford and
set across dry, and then he said farewell to the elves and climbed carefully
back towards the Gate. Great weariness began to come over him; but it
was well before midnight when he clambered up the rope again—it was
still where he had left it. He untied it and hid it, and then he sat down on
the wall and wondered anxiously what would happen next.
At midnight he woke up Bombur; and then in turn rolled himself up in
his corner, without listening to the old dwarf ’s thanks (which he felt he
had hardly earned). He was soon fast asleep forgetting all his worries till
the morning. As a matter of fact he was dreaming of eggs and bacon.
Chapter XVII
THE CLOUDS BURST
Next day the trumpets rang early in the camp. Soon a single runner was
seen hurrying along the narrow path. At a distance he stood and hailed
them, asking whether Thorin would now listen to another embassy, since
new tidings had come to hand, and matters were changed.
“That will be Dain!” said Thorin when he heard. “They will have got
wind of his coming. I thought that would alter their mood! Bid them come
few in number and weaponless, and I will hear,” he called to the
messenger.
About midday the banners of the Forest and the Lake were seen to be
borne forth again. A company of twenty was approaching. At the
beginning of the narrow way they laid aside sword and spear, and came on
towards the Gate. Wondering, the dwarves saw that among them were both
Bard and the Elvenking, before whom an old man wrapped in cloak and
hood bore a strong casket of iron-bound wood.
“Hail Thorin!” said Bard. “Are you still of the same mind?”
“My mind does not change with the rising and setting of a few suns,”
answered Thorin. “Did you come to ask me idle questions? Still the elf-
host has not departed as I bade! Till then you come in vain to bargain with
me.”
“Is there then nothing for which you would yield any of your gold?”
“Nothing that you or your friends have to offer.”
“What of the Arkenstone of Thrain?” said he, and at the same moment
the old man opened the casket and held aloft the jewel. The light leapt
from his hand, bright and white in the morning.
Then Thorin was stricken dumb with amazement and confusion. No one
spoke for a long while.
Thorin at length broke the silence, and his voice was thick with wrath.
“That stone was my father’s, and is mine,” he said. “Why should I
purchase my own?” But wonder overcame him and he added: “But how
came you by the heirloom of my house—if there is need to ask such a
question of thieves?”
“We are not thieves,” Bard answered. “Your own we will give back in
return for our own.”
“How came you by it?” shouted Thorin in gathering rage.
“I gave it to them!” squeaked Bilbo, who was peering over the wall, by
now in a dreadful fright.
“You! You!” cried Thorin, turning upon him and grasping him with
both hands. “You miserable hobbit! You undersized—burglar!” he shouted
at a loss for words, and he shook poor Bilbo like a rabbit.
“By the beard of Durin! I wish I had Gandalf here! Curse him for his
choice of you! May his beard wither! As for you I will throw you to the
rocks!” he cried and lifted Bilbo in his arms.
“Stay! Your wish is granted!” said a voice. The old man with the casket
threw aside his hood and cloak. “Here is Gandalf! And none too soon it
seems. If you don’t like my Burglar, please don’t damage him.
Put him down, and listen first to what he has to say!”
“You all seem in league!” said Thorin dropping Bilbo on the top of the
wall. “Never again will I have dealings with any wizard or his friends.
What have you to say, you descendant of rats?”
“Dear me! Dear me!” said Bilbo. “I am sure this is all very
uncomfortable. You may remember saying that I might choose my own
fourteenth share? Perhaps I took it too literally—I have been told that
dwarves are sometimes politer in word than in deed. The time was, all the
same, when you seemed to think that I had been of some service.
Descendant of rats, indeed! Is this all the service of you and your family
that I was promised, Thorin? Take it that I have disposed of my share as I
wished, and let it go at that!”
“I will,” said Thorin grimly. “And I will let you go at that—and may we
never meet again!” Then he turned and spoke over the wall. “I am
betrayed,” he said. “It was rightly guessed that I could not forbear to
redeem the Arkenstone, the treasure of my house. For it I will give one
fourteenth share of the hoard in silver and gold, setting aside the gems; but
that shall be accounted the promised share of this traitor, and with that
reward he shall depart, and you can divide it as you will. He will get little
enough, I doubt not. Take him, if you wish him to live; and no friendship
of mine goes with him.
“Get down now to your friends!” he said to Bilbo, “or I will throw you
down.”
“What about the gold and silver?” asked Bilbo. “That shall follow after,
as can be arranged,” said he. “Get down!”
“Until then we keep the stone,” cried Bard.
“You are not making a very splendid figure as King under the
Mountain,” said Gandalf. “But things may change yet.”
“They may indeed,” said Thorin. And already, so strong was the
bewilderment of the treasure upon him, he was pondering whether by the
help of Dain he might not recapture the Arkenstone and withhold the share
of the reward.
And so Bilbo was swung down from the wall, and departed with
nothing for all his trouble, except the armour which Thorin had given him
already. More than one of the dwarves in their hearts felt shame and pity at
his going.
“Farewell!” he cried to them. “We may meet again as friends.”
“Be off!” called Thorin. “You have mail upon you, which was made by
my folk, and is too good for you. It cannot be pierced by arrows; but if you
do not hasten, I will sting your miserable feet. So be swift!”
“Not so hasty!” said Bard. “We will give you until tomorrow. At noon
we will return, and see if you have brought from the hoard the portion that
is to be set against the stone. If that is done without deceit, then we will
depart, and the elf-host will go back to the Forest. In the meanwhile
farewell!”
With that they went back to the camp; but Thorin sent messengers by
Roäc telling Dain of what had passed, and bidding him come with wary
speed.
That day passed and the night. The next day the wind shifted west, and the
air was dark and gloomy. The morning was still early when a cry was
heard in the camp. Runners came in to report that a host of dwarves had
appeared round the eastern spur of the Mountain and was now hastening to
Dale. Dain had come. He had hurried on through the night, and so had
come upon them sooner than they had expected. Each one of his folk was
clad in a hauberk of steel mail that hung to his knees, and his legs were
covered with hose of a fine and flexible metal mesh, the secret of whose
making was possessed by Dain’s people. The dwarves are exceedingly
strong for their height, but most of these were strong even for dwarves. In
battle they wielded heavy two-handed mattocks; but each of them had also
a short broad sword at his side and a roundshield slung at his back. Their
beards were forked and plaited and thrust into their belts. Their caps were
of iron and they were shod with iron, and their faces were grim.
Trumpets called men and elves to arms. Before long the dwarves could
be seen coming up the valley at a great pace. They halted between the river
and the eastern spur; but a few held on their way, and crossing the river
drew near the camp; and there they laid down their weapons and held up
their hands in sign of peace. Bard went out to meet them, and with him
went Bilbo.
“We are sent from Dain son of Nain,” they said when questioned. “We
are hastening to our kinsmen in the Mountain, since we learn that the
kingdom of old is renewed. But who are you that sit in the plain as foes
before defended walls?” This, of course, in the polite and rather old-
fashioned language of such occasions, meant simply: “You have no
business here. We are going on, so make way or we shall fight you!” They
meant to push on between the Mountain and the loop of the river; for the
narrow land there did not seem to be strongly guarded.
Bard, of course, refused to allow the dwarves to go straight on to the
Mountain. He was determined to wait until the gold and silver had been
brought out in exchange for the Arkenstone; for he did not believe that this
would be done, if once the fortress was manned with so large and warlike a
company. They had brought with them a great store of supplies; for the
dwarves can carry very heavy burdens, and nearly all of Dain’s folk, in
spite of their rapid march, bore huge packs on their backs in addition to
their weapons. They would stand a siege for weeks, and by that time yet
more dwarves might come, and yet more, for Thorin had many relatives.
Also they would be able to reopen and guard some other gate, so that the
besiegers would have to encircle the whole mountain; and for that they had
not sufficient numbers.
These were, in fact, precisely their plans (for the raven-messengers had
been busy between Thorin and Dain); but for the moment the way was
barred, so after angry words the dwarf-messengers retired muttering in
their beards. Bard then sent messengers at once to the Gate; but they found
no gold or payment. Arrows came forth as soon as they were within shot,
and they hastened back in dismay. In the camp all was now astir, as if for
battle; for the dwarves of Dain were advancing along the eastern bank.
“Fools!” laughed Bard, “to come thus beneath the Mountain’s arm!
They do not understand war above ground, whatever they may know of
battle in the mines. There are many of our archers and spearmen now
hidden in the rocks upon their right flank. Dwarf-mail may be good, but
they will soon be hard put to it. Let us set on them now from both sides,
before they are fully rested!”
But the Elvenking said: “Long will I tarry, ere I begin this war for gold.
The dwarves cannot pass us, unless we will, or do anything that we cannot
mark. Let us hope still for something that will bring reconciliation. Our
advantage in numbers will be enough, if in the end it must come to
unhappy blows.”
But he reckoned without the dwarves. The knowledge that the
Arkenstone was in the hands of the besiegers burned in their thoughts; also
they guessed the hesitation of Bard and his friends, and resolved to strike
while they debated.
Suddenly without a signal they sprang silently forward to attack. Bows
twanged and arrows whistled; battle was about to be joined.
Still more suddenly a darkness came on with dreadful swiftness! A
black cloud hurried over the sky. Winter thunder on a wild wind rolled
roaring up and rumbled in the Mountain, and lightning lit its peak. And
beneath the thunder another blackness could be seen whirling forward; but
it did not come with the wind, it came from the North, like a vast cloud of
birds, so dense that no light could be seen between their wings.
“Halt!” cried Gandalf, who appeared suddenly, and stood alone, with
arms uplifted, between the advancing dwarves and the ranks awaiting
them. “Halt!” he called in a voice like thunder, and his staff blazed forth
with a flash like the lightning. “Dread has come upon you all! Alas! it has
come more swiftly than I guessed. The Goblins are upon you! Bolg* of the
North is coming, O Dain! whose father you slew in Moria. Behold! the
bats are above his army like a sea of locusts. They ride upon wolves and
Wargs are in their train!”
Amazement and confusion fell upon them all. Even as Gandalf had
been speaking the darkness grew. The dwarves halted and gazed at the sky.
The elves cried out with many voices.
“Come!” called Gandalf. “There is yet time for council. Let Dain son of
Nain come swiftly to us!”
So began a battle that none had expected; and it was called the Battle of
Five Armies, and it was very terrible. Upon one side were the Goblins and
the Wild Wolves, and upon the other were Elves and Men and Dwarves.
This is how it fell out. Ever since the fall of the Great Goblin of the Misty
Mountains the hatred of their race for the dwarves had been rekindled to
fury. Messengers had passed to and fro between all their cities, colonies
and strongholds; for they resolved now to win the dominion of the North.
Tidings they had gathered in secret ways; and in all the mountains there
was a forging and an arming. Then they marched and gathered by hill and
valley, going ever by tunnel or under dark, until around and beneath the
great mountain Gundabad of the North, where was their capital, a vast host
was assembled ready to sweep down in time of storm unawares
upon the South. Then they learned of the death of Smaug, and joy was
in their hearts; and they hastened night after night through the mountains,
and came thus at last on a sudden from the North hard on the heels of
Dain. Not even the ravens knew of their coming until they came out in the
broken lands which divided the Lonely Mountain from the hills behind.
How much Gandalf knew cannot be said, but it is plain that he had not
expected this sudden assault.
This is the plan that he made in council with the Elven-king and with
Bard; and with Dain, for the dwarf-lord now joined them: the Goblins were
the foes of all, and at their coming all other quarrels were forgotten. Their
only hope was to lure the goblins into the valley between the arms of the
Mountain; and themselves to man the great spurs that struck south and
east. Yet this would be perilous, if the goblins were in sufficient numbers
to overrun the Mountain itself, and so attack them also from behind and
above; but there was no time to make any other plan, or to summon any
help.
Soon the thunder passed, rolling away to the South-East; but the bat-
cloud came, flying lower, over the shoulder of the Mountain, and whirled
above them shutting out the light and filling them with dread.
“To the Mountain!” called Bard. “To the Mountain! Let us take our
places while there is yet time!”
On the Southern spur, in its lower slopes and in the rocks at its feet, the
Elves were set; on the Eastern spur were men and dwarves. But Bard and
some of the nimblest of men and elves climbed to the height of the Eastern
shoulder to gain a view to the North. Soon they could see the lands before
the Mountain’s feet black with a hurrying multitude. Ere long the vanguard
swirled round the spur’s end and came rushing into Dale. These were the
swiftest wolf-riders, and already their cries and howls rent the air afar. A
few brave men were strung before them to make a feint of resistance, and
many there fell before the rest drew back and fled to either side. As
Gandalf had hoped, the goblin army had gathered behind the resisted
vanguard, and poured now in rage into the valley, driving wildly up
between the arms of the Mountain, seeking for the foe. Their banners were
countless, black and red, and they came on like a tide in fury and disorder.
It was a terrible battle. The most dreadful of all Bilbo’s experiences,
and the one which at the time he hated most—which is to say it was the
one he was most proud of, and most fond of recalling long afterwards,
although he was quite unimportant in it. Actually I may say he put on his
ring early in the business, and vanished from sight, if not from all danger.
A magic ring of that sort is not a complete protection in a goblin charge,
nor does it stop flying arrows and wild spears; but it does help in getting
out of the way, and it prevents your head from being specially chosen for a
sweeping stroke by a goblin swordsman.
The elves were the first to charge. Their hatred for the goblins is cold
and bitter. Their spears and swords shone in the gloom with a gleam of
chill flame, so deadly was the wrath of the hands that held them. As soon
as the host of their enemies was dense in the valley, they sent against it a
shower of arrows, and each flickered as it fled as if with stinging fire.
Behind the arrows a thousand of their spearmen leapt down and charged.
The yells were deafening. The rocks were stained black with goblin blood.
Just as the goblins were recovering from the onslaught and the elf-
charge was halted, there rose from across the valley a deep-throated roar.
With cries of “Moria!” and “Dain, Dain!” the dwarves of the Iron Hills
plunged in, wielding their mattocks, upon the other side; and beside them
came the men of the Lake with long swords.
Panic came upon the Goblins; and even as they turned to meet this new
attack, the elves charged again with renewed numbers. Already many of
the goblins were flying back down the river to escape from the trap; and
many of their own wolves were turning upon them and rending the dead
and the wounded. Victory seemed at hand, when a cry rang out on the
heights above.
Goblins had scaled the Mountain from the other side and already many
were on the slopes above the Gate, and others were streaming down
recklessly, heedless of those that fell screaming from cliff and precipice,
to attack the spurs from above. Each of these could be reached by paths
that ran down from the main mass of the Mountain in the centre; and the
defenders had too few to bar the way for long. Victory now vanished from
hope. They had only stemmed the first onslaught of the black tide.
Day drew on. The goblins gathered again in the valley. There a host of
Wargs came ravening and with them came the bodyguard of Bolg, goblins
of huge size with scimitars of steel. Soon actual darkness was coming into
a stormy sky; while still the great bats swirled about the heads and ears of
elves and men, or fastened vampire-like on the stricken. Now Bard was
fighting to defend the Eastern spur, and yet giving slowly back; and the
elf-lords were at bay about their king upon the southern arm, near to the
watch-post on Ravenhill.
Suddenly there was a great shout, and from the Gate came a trumpet
call. They had forgotten Thorin! Part of the wall, moved by levers, fell
outward with a crash into the pool. Out leapt the King under the Mountain,
and his companions followed him. Hood and cloak were gone; they were
in shining armour, and red light leapt from their eyes. In the gloom the
great dwarf gleamed like gold in a dying fire.
Rocks were hurled down from on high by the goblins above; but they
held on, leapt down to the falls’ foot, and rushed forward to battle. Wolf
and rider fell or fled before them. Thorin wielded his axe with mighty
strokes, and nothing seemed to harm him.
“To me! To me! Elves and Men! To me! O my kinsfolk!” he cried, and
his voice shook like a horn in the valley.
Down, heedless of order, rushed all the dwarves of Dain to his help.
Down too came many of the Lake-men, for Bard could not restrain them;
and out upon the other side came many of the spearmen of the elves. Once
again the goblins were stricken in the valley; and they were piled in heaps
till Dale was dark and hideous with their corpses. The Wargs were
scattered and Thorin drove right against the bodyguard of Bolg. But he
could not pierce their ranks.
Already behind him among the goblin dead lay many men and many
dwarves, and many a fair elf that should have lived yet long ages merrily
in the wood. And as the valley widened his onset grew ever slower. His
numbers were too few. His flanks were unguarded. Soon the attackers were
attacked, and they were forced into a great ring, facing every way, hemmed
all about with goblins and wolves returning to the assault. The bodyguard
of Bolg came howling against them, and drove in upon their ranks like
waves upon cliffs of sand. Their friends could not help them, for the
assault from the Mountain was renewed with redoubled force, and upon
either side men and elves were being slowly beaten down.
On all this Bilbo looked with misery. He had taken his stand on
Ravenhill among the Elves—partly because there was more chance of
escape from that point, and partly (with the more Tookish part of his mind)
because if he was going to be in a last desperate stand, he preferred on the
whole to defend the Elvenking. Gandalf, too, I may say, was there, sitting
on the ground as if in deep thought, preparing, I suppose, some last blast
of magic before the end.
That did not seem far off. “It will not be long now,” thought Bilbo,
“before the goblins win the Gate, and we are all slaughtered or driven
down and captured. Really it is enough to make one weep, after all one has
gone through. I would rather old Smaug had been left with all the wretched
treasure, than that these vile creatures should get it, and poor old Bombur,
and Balin and Fili and Kili and all the rest come to a bad end; and Bard
too, and the Lake-men and the merry elves. Misery me! I have heard songs
of many battles, and I have always understood that defeat may be glorious.
It seems very uncomfortable, not to say distressing. I wish I was well out
of it.”
The clouds were torn by the wind, and a red sunset slashed the West.
Seeing the sudden gleam in the gloom Bilbo looked round. He gave a great
cry: he had seen a sight that made his heart leap, dark shapes small yet
majestic against the distant glow.
“The Eagles! The Eagles!” he shouted. “The Eagles are coming!”
Bilbo’s eyes were seldom wrong. The eagles were coming down the
wind, line after line, in such a host as must have gathered from all the
eyries of the North.
“The Eagles! the Eagles!” Bilbo cried, dancing and waving his arms. If
the elves could not see him they could hear him. Soon they too took up the
cry, and it echoed across the valley. Many wondering eyes looked up,
though as yet nothing could be seen except from the southern shoulders of
the Mountain.
“The Eagles!” cried Bilbo once more, but at that moment a stone
hurtling from above smote heavily on his helm, and he fell with a crash
and knew no more.
Chapter XVIII
THE RETURN JOURNEY
When Bilbo came to himself, he was literally by himself. He was lying on
the flat stones of Ravenhill, and no one was near. A cloudless day, but cold,
was broad above him. He was shaking, and as chilled as stone, but his head
burned with fire.
“Now I wonder what has happened?” he said to himself. “At any rate I
am not yet one of the fallen heroes; but I suppose there is still time enough
for that!”
He sat up painfully. Looking into the valley he could see no living
goblins. After a while as his head cleared a little, he thought he could see
elves moving in the rocks below. He rubbed his eyes. Surely there was a
camp still in the plain some distance off; and there was a coming and
going about the Gate? Dwarves seemed to be busy removing the wall. But
all was deadly still. There was no call and no echo of a song. Sorrow
seemed to be in the air.
“Victory after all, I suppose!” he said, feeling his aching head. “Well, it
seems a very gloomy business.”
Suddenly he was aware of a man climbing up and coming towards him.
“Hullo there!” he called with a shaky voice. “Hullo there! What news?”
“What voice is it that speaks among the stones?” said the man halting
and peering about him not far from where Bilbo sat.
Then Bilbo remembered his ring! “Well I’m blessed!” said he. “This
invisibility has its drawbacks after all. Otherwise I suppose I might have
spent a warm and comfortable night in bed!”
“It’s me, Bilbo Baggins, companion of Thorin!” he cried, hurriedly
taking off the ring.
“It is well that I have found you!” said the man striding forward. “You
are needed and we have looked for you long. You would have been
numbered among the dead, who are many, if Gandalf the wizard had not
said that your voice was last heard in this place. I have been sent to look
here for the last time. Are you much hurt?”
“A nasty knock on the head, I think,” said Bilbo. “But I have a helm
and a hard skull. All the same I feel sick and my legs are like straws.”
“I will carry you down to the camp in the valley,” said the man, and
picked him lightly up.
The man was swift and sure-footed. It was not long before Bilbo was
set down before a tent in Dale; and there stood Gandalf, with his arm in a
sling. Even the wizard had not escaped without a wound; and there were
few unharmed in all the host.
When Gandalf saw Bilbo, he was delighted. “Baggins!” he exclaimed.
“Well I never! Alive after all—I am glad! I began to wonder if even your
luck would see you through! A terrible business, and it nearly was
disastrous. But other news can wait. Come!” he said more gravely. “You
are called for;” and leading the hobbit he took him within the tent.
“Hail! Thorin,” he said as he entered. “I have brought him.”
There indeed lay Thorin Oakenshield, wounded with many wounds, and
his rent armour and notched axe were cast upon the floor. He looked up as
Bilbo came beside him.
“Farewell, good thief,” he said. “I go now to the halls of waiting to sit
beside my fathers, until the world is renewed. Since I leave now all gold
and silver, and go where it is of little worth, I wish to part in friendship
from you, and I would take back my words and deeds at the Gate.”
Bilbo knelt on one knee filled with sorrow. “Farewell, King under the
Mountain!” he said. “This is a bitter adventure, if it must end so; and not a
mountain of gold can amend it. Yet I am glad that I have shared in your
perils—that has been more than any Baggins deserves.”
“No!” said Thorin. “There is more in you of good than you know, child
of the kindly West. Some courage and some wisdom, blended in measure.
If more of us valued food and cheer and song above hoarded gold, it would
be a merrier world. But sad or merry, I must leave it now. Farewell!”
Then Bilbo turned away, and he went by himself, and sat alone wrapped
in a blanket, and, whether you believe it or not, he wept until his eyes were
red and his voice was hoarse. He was a kindly little soul. Indeed it was
long before he had the heart to make a joke again. “A mercy it is,” he said
at last to himself, “that I woke up when I did. I wish Thorin were living,
but I am glad that we parted in kindness. You are a fool, Bilbo Baggins,
and you made a great mess of that business with the stone; and there was a
battle, in spite of all your efforts to buy peace and quiet, but I suppose you
can hardly be blamed for that.”
All that had happened after he was stunned, Bilbo learned later; but it gave
him more sorrow than joy, and he was now weary of his adventure. He was
aching in his bones for the homeward journey. That, however, was a little
delayed, so in the meantime I will tell something of events. The Eagles
had long had suspicion of the goblins’ mustering; from their watchfulness
the movements in the mountains could not be altogether hid. So they too
had gathered in great numbers, under the great Eagle of the Misty
Mountains; and at length smelling battle from afar they had come
speeding down the gale in the nick of time. They it was who dislodged the
goblins from the mountain-slopes, casting them over precipices, or driving
them down shrieking and bewildered among their foes. It was not long
before they had freed the Lonely Mountain, and elves and men on either
side of the valley could come at last to the help of the battle below.
But even with the Eagles they were still outnumbered. In that last hour
Beorn himself had appeared—no one knew how or from where. He came
alone, and in bear’s shape; and he seemed to have grown almost to giant-
size in his wrath.
The roar of his voice was like drums and guns; and he tossed wolves
and goblins from his path like straws and feathers. He fell upon their rear,
and broke like a clap of thunder through the ring. The dwarves were
making a stand still about their lords upon a low rounded hill. Then Beorn
stooped and lifted Thorin, who had fallen pierced with spears, and bore
him out of the fray.
Swiftly he returned and his wrath was redoubled, so that nothing could
withstand him, and no weapon seemed to bite upon him. He scattered the
bodyguard, and pulled down Bolg himself and crushed him. Then dismay
fell on the Goblins and they fled in all directions. But weariness left their
enemies with the coming of new hope, and they pursued them closely, and
prevented most of them from escaping where they could. They drove many
of them into the Running River, and such as fled south or west they hunted
into the marshes about the Forest River; and there the greater part of the
last fugitives perished, while those that came hardly to the Wood-elves’
realm were there slain, or drawn in to die deep in the trackless dark of
Mirkwood. Songs have said that three parts of the goblin warriors of the
North perished on that day, and the mountains had peace for many a year.
Victory had been assured before the fall of night; but the pursuit was
still on foot, when Bilbo returned to the camp; and not many were in the
valley save the more grievously wounded.
“Where are the Eagles?” he asked Gandalf that evening, as he lay
wrapped in many warm blankets.
“Some are in the hunt,” said the wizard, “but most have gone back to
their eyries. They would not stay here, and departed with the first light of
morning. Dain has crowned their chief with gold, and sworn friendship
with them forever.”
“I am sorry. I mean, I should have liked to see them again,” said Bilbo
sleepily; “perhaps I shall see them on the way home. I suppose I shall be
going home soon?”
“As soon as you like,” said the wizard.
Actually it was some days before Bilbo really set out. They buried
Thorin deep beneath the Mountain, and Bard laid the Arkenstone upon his
breast.
“There let it lie till the Mountain falls!” he said. “May it bring good
fortune to all his folk that dwell here after!”
Upon his tomb the Elvenking then laid Orcrist, the elvish sword that
had been taken from Thorin in captivity. It is said in songs that it gleamed
ever in the dark if foes approached, and the fortress of the dwarves could
not be taken by surprise. There now Dain son of Nain took up his abode,
and he became King under the Mountain, and in time many other dwarves
gathered to his throne in the ancient halls. Of the twelve companions of
Thorin, ten remained. Fili and Kili had fallen defending him with shield
and body, for he was their mother’s elder brother. The others remained
with Dain; for Dain dealt his treasure well.
There was, of course, no longer any question of dividing the hoard in
such shares as had been planned, to Balin and Dwalin, and Dori and Nori
and Ori, and Oin and Gloin, and Bifur and Bofur and Bombur—or to
Bilbo. Yet a fourteenth share of all the silver and gold, wrought and
unwrought, was given up to Bard; for Dain said: “We will honour the
agreement of the dead, and he has now the Arkenstone in his keeping.”
Even a fourteenth share was wealth exceedingly great, greater than that
of many mortal kings. From that treasure Bard sent much gold to the
Master of Lake-town; and he rewarded his followers and friends freely. To
the Elvenking he gave the emeralds of Girion, such jewels as he most
loved, which Dain had restored to him.
To Bilbo he said: “This treasure is as much yours as it is mine; though
old agreements cannot stand, since so many have a claim in its winning
and defence. Yet even though you were willing to lay aside all your claim,
I should wish that the words of Thorin, of which he repented, should not
prove true: that we should give you little. I would reward you most richly
of all.”
“Very kind of you,” said Bilbo. “But really it is a relief to me. How on
earth should I have got all that treasure home without war and murder all
along the way, I don’t know. And I don’t know what I should have done
with it when I got home. I am sure it is better in your hands.”
In the end he would only take two small chests, one filled with silver,
and the other with gold, such as one strong pony could carry. “That will be
quite as much as I can manage,” said he.
At last the time came for him to say good-bye to his friends. “Farewell,
Balin!” he said; “and farewell, Dwalin; and farewell Dori, Nori, Ori, Oin,
Gloin, Bifur, Bofur, and Bombur! May your beards never grow thin!” And
turning towards the Mountain he added: “Farewell Thorin Oakenshield!
And Fili and Kili! May your memory never fade!”
Then the dwarves bowed low before their Gate, but words stuck in their
throats. “Good-bye and good luck, wherever you fare!” said Balin at last.
“If ever you visit us again, when our halls are made fair once more, then
the feast shall indeed be splendid!”
“If ever you are passing my way,” said Bilbo, “don’t wait to knock! Tea
is at four; but any of you are welcome at any time!”
Then he turned away.
The elf-host was on the march; and if it was sadly lessened, yet many were
glad, for now the northern world would be merrier for many a long day.
The dragon was dead, and the goblins overthrown, and their hearts looked
forward after winter to a spring of joy.
Gandalf and Bilbo rode behind the Elvenking, and beside them strode
Beorn, once again in man’s shape, and he laughed and sang in a loud voice
upon the road. So they went on until they drew near to the borders of
Mirkwood, to the north of the place where the Forest River ran out. Then
they halted, for the wizard and Bilbo would not enter the wood, even
though the king bade them stay a while in his halls. They intended to go
along the edge of the forest, and round its northern end in the waste that
lay between it and the beginning of the Grey Mountains. It was a long and
cheerless road, but now that the goblins were crushed, it seemed safer to
them than the dreadful pathways under the trees. Moreover Beorn was
going that way too.
“Farewell! O Elvenking!” said Gandalf. “Merry be the greenwood,
while the world is yet young! And merry be all your folk!”
“Farewell! O Gandalf!” said the king. “May you ever appear where you
are most needed and least expected! The oftener you appear in my halls
the better shall I be pleased!”
“I beg of you,” said Bilbo stammering and standing on one foot, “to
accept this gift!” and he brought out a necklace of silver and pearls that
Dain had given him at their parting.
“In what way have I earned such a gift, O hobbit?” said the king.
“Well, er, I thought, don’t you know,” said Bilbo rather confused, “that,
er, some little return should be made for your, er, hospitality. I mean even
a burglar has his feelings. I have drunk much of your wine and eaten much
of your bread.”
“I will take your gift, O Bilbo the Magnificent!” said the king gravely.
“And I name you elf-friend and blessed. May your shadow never grow less
(or stealing would be too easy)! Farewell!”
Then the elves turned towards the Forest, and Bilbo started on his long
road home.
He had many hardships and adventures before he got back. The Wild was
still the Wild, and there were many other things in it in those days beside
goblins; but he was well guided and well guarded—the wizard was with
him, and Beorn for much of the way—and he was never in great danger
again. Anyway by midwinter Gandalf and Bilbo had come all the way
back, along both edges of the Forest, to the doors of Beorn’s house; and
there for a while they both stayed. Yule-tide was warm and merry there;
and men came from far and wide to feast at Beorn’s bidding. The goblins
of the Misty Mountains were now few and terrified, and hidden in the
deepest holes they could find; and the Wargs had vanished from the
woods, so that men went abroad without fear. Beorn indeed became a great
chief afterwards in those regions and ruled a wide land between the
mountains and the wood; and it is said that for many generations the men
of his line had the power of taking bear’s shape, and some were grim men
and bad, but most were in heart like Beorn, if less in size and strength. In
their day the last goblins were hunted from the Misty Mountains and a
new peace came over the edge of the Wild.
It was spring, and a fair one with mild weathers and a bright sun, before
Bilbo and Gandalf took their leave at last of Beorn, and though he longed
for home, Bilbo left with regret, for the flowers of the gardens of Beorn
were in springtime no less marvellous than in high summer.
At last they came up the long road, and reached the very pass where the
goblins had captured them before. But they came to that high point at
morning, and looking backward they saw a white sun shining over the
outstretched lands. There behind lay Mirkwood, blue in the distance, and
darkly green at the nearer edge even in the spring. There far away was the
Lonely Mountain on the edge of eyesight. On its highest peak snow yet
unmelted was gleaming pale.
“So comes snow after fire, and even dragons have their ending!” said
Bilbo, and he turned his back on his adventure. The Tookish part was
getting very tired, and the Baggins was daily getting stronger. “I wish now
only to be in my own armchair!” he said.
Chapter XIX
THE LAST STAGE
It was on May the First that the two came back at last to the brink of the
valley of Rivendell, where stood the Last (or the First) Homely House.
Again it was evening, their ponies were tired, especially the one that
carried the baggage; and they all felt in need of rest. As they rode down
the steep path, Bilbo heard the elves still singing in the trees, as if they had
not stopped since he left; and as soon as the riders came down into the
lower glades of the wood they burst into a song of much the same kind as
before. This is something like it:
The dragon is withered,
His bones are now crumbled;
His armour is shivered,
His splendour is humbled!
Though sword shall be rusted,
And throne and crown perish
With strength that men trusted
And wealth that they cherish,
Here grass is still growing,
And leaves are yet swinging,
The white water flowing,
And elves are yet singing
Come! Tra-la-la-lally!
Come back to the valley!
The stars are far brighter
Than gems without measure,
The moon is far whiter
Than silver in treasure;
The fire is more shining
On hearth in the gloaming
Than gold won by mining,
So why go a-roaming?
O! Tra-la-la-lally
Come back to the Valley.
O! Where are you going,
So late in returning?
The river is flowing,
The stars are all burning!
O! Whither so laden,
So sad and so dreary?
Here elf and elf-maiden
Now welcome the weary
With Tra-la-la-lally
Come back to the Valley,
Tra-la-la-lally
Fa-la-la-lally
Fa-la!
Then the elves of the valley came out and greeted them and led them
across the water to the house of Elrond. There a warm welcome was made
them, and there were many eager ears that evening to hear the tale of their
adventures. Gandalf it was who spoke, for Bilbo was fallen quiet and
drowsy. Most of the tale he knew, for he had been in it, and had himself
told much of it to the wizard on their homeward way or in the house of
Beorn; but every now and again he would open one eye, and listen, when a
part of the story which he did not yet know came in.
It was in this way that he learned where Gandalf had been to; for he
overheard the words of the wizard to Elrond. It appeared that Gandalf had
been to a great council of the white wizards, masters of lore and good
magic; and that they had at last driven the Necromancer from his dark
hold in the south of Mirkwood.
“Ere long now,” Gandalf was saying, “the Forest will grow somewhat
more wholesome. The North will be freed from that horror for many long
years, I hope. Yet I wish he were banished from the world!”
“It would be well indeed,” said Elrond; “but I fear that will not come
about in this age of the world, or for many after.”
When the tale of their journeyings was told, there were other tales, and
yet more tales, tales of long ago, and tales of new things, and tales of no
time at all, till Bilbo’s head fell forward on his chest, and he snored
comfortably in a corner.
He woke to find himself in a white bed, and the moon shining through
an open window. Below it many elves were singing loud and clear on the
banks of the stream.
Sing all ye joyful, now sing all together!
The wind’s in the tree-top, the wind’s in the heather;
The stars are in blossom, the moon is in flower,
And bright are the windows of Night in her tower.
Dance all ye joyful, now dance all together!
Soft is the grass, and let foot be like feather!
The river is silver, the shadows are fleeting;
Merry is May-time, and merry our meeting.
Sing we now softly, and dreams let us weave him!
Wind him in slumber and there let us leave him!
The wanderer sleepeth. Now soft be his pillow! Lullaby!
Lullaby! Alder and Willow!
Sigh no more Pine, till the wind of the morn!
Fall Moon! Dark be the land!
Hush! Hush! Oak, Ash, and Thorn!
Hushed be all water, till dawn is at hand!
“Well, Merry People!” said Bilbo looking out. “What time by the moon
is this? Your lullaby would waken a drunken goblin! Yet I thank you.”
“And your snores would waken a stone dragon—yet we thank you,”
they answered with laughter. “It is drawing towards dawn, and you have
slept now since the night’s beginning. Tomorrow, perhaps, you will be
cured of weariness.”
“A little sleep does a great cure in the house of Elrond,” said he; “but I
will take all the cure I can get. A second good night, fair friends!” And
with that he went back to bed and slept till late morning.
Weariness fell from him soon in that house, and he had many a merry
jest and dance, early and late, with the elves of the valley. Yet even that
place could not long delay him now, and he thought always of his own
home. After a week, therefore, he said farewell to Elrond, and giving him
such small gifts as he would accept, he rode away with Gandalf.
Even as they left the valley the sky darkened in the West before them,
and wind and rain came up to meet them.
“Merry is May-time!” said Bilbo, as the rain beat into his face. “But
our back is to legends and we are coming home. I suppose this is the first
taste of it.”
“There is a long road yet,” said Gandalf.
“But it is the last road,” said Bilbo.
They came to the river that marked the very edge of the borderland of
the Wild, and to the ford beneath the steep bank, which you may
remember. The water was swollen both with the melting of the snows at
the approach of summer, and with the daylong rain; but they crossed with
some difficulty, and pressed forward, as evening fell, on the last stage of
their journey.
This was much as it had been before, except that the company was
smaller, and more silent; also this time there were no trolls. At each point
on the road Bilbo recalled the happenings and the words of a year ago—it
seemed to him more like ten—so that, of course, he quickly noted the
place where the pony had fallen in the river, and they had turned aside for
their nasty adventure with Tom and Bert and Bill.
Not far from the road they found the gold of the trolls, which they had
buried, still hidden and untouched. “I have enough to last me my time,”
said Bilbo, when they had dug it up. “You had better take this, Gandalf. I
daresay you can find a use for it.”
“Indeed I can!” said the wizard. “But share and share alike! You may
find you have more needs than you expect.”
So they put the gold in bags and slung them on the ponies, who were
not at all pleased about it. After that their going was slower, for most of
the time they walked. But the land was green and there was much grass
through which the hobbit strolled along contentedly. He mopped his face
with a red silk handkerchief—no! not a single one of his own had
survived, he had borrowed this one from Elrond—for now June had
brought summer, and the weather was bright and hot again.
As all things come to an end, even this story, a day came at last when
they were in sight of the country where Bilbo had been born and bred,
where the shapes of the land and of the trees were as well known to him as
his hands and toes. Coming to a rise he could see his own Hill in the
distance, and he stopped suddenly and said:
Roads go ever ever on,
Over rock and under tree,
By caves where never sun has shone,
By streams that never find the sea;
Over snow by winter sown,
And through the merry flowers of June,
Over grass and over stone,
And under mountains in the moon.
Roads go ever ever on
Under cloud and under star,
Yet feet that wandering have gone
Turn at last to home afar.
Eyes that fire and sword have seen
And horror in the halls of stone
Look at last on meadows green
And trees and hills they long have known.
Gandalf looked at him. “My dear Bilbo!” he said. “Something is the
matter with you! You are not the hobbit that you were.”
And so they crossed the bridge and passed the mill by the river and
came right back to Bilbo’s own door.
“Bless me! What’s going on?” he cried. There was a great commotion,
and people of all sorts, respectable and unrespectable, were thick round the
door, and many were going in and out—not even wiping their feet on the
mat, as Bilbo noticed with annoyance.
If he was surprised, they were more surprised still. He had arrived back
in the middle of an auction! There was a large notice in black and red hung
on the gate, stating that on June the Twenty-second Messrs Grubb, Grubb,
and Burrowes would sell by auction the effects of the late Bilbo Baggins
Esquire, of Bag-End, Underhill, Hobbiton. Sale to commence at ten
o’clock sharp. It was now nearly lunchtime, and most of the things had
already been sold, for various prices from next to nothing to old songs (as
is not unusual at auctions). Bilbo’s cousins the Sackville-Bagginses were,
in fact, busy measuring his rooms to see if their own furniture would fit. In
short Bilbo was “Presumed Dead”, and not everybody that said so was
sorry to find the presumption wrong.
The return of Mr. Bilbo Baggins created quite a disturbance, both under
the Hill and over the Hill, and across the Water; it was a great deal more
than a nine days’ wonder. The legal bother, indeed, lasted for years. It was
quite a long time before Mr. Baggins was in fact admitted to be alive
again. The people who had got specially good bargains at the Sale took a
deal of convincing; and in the end to save time Bilbo had to buy back quite
a lot of his own furniture. Many of his silver spoons mysteriously
disappeared and were never accounted for. Personally he suspected the
Sackville-Bagginses. On their side they never admitted that the returned
Baggins was genuine, and they were not on friendly terms with Bilbo ever
after. They really had wanted to live in his nice hobbit-hole so very much.
Indeed Bilbo found he had lost more than spoons—he had lost his
reputation. It is true that for ever after he remained an elf-friend, and had
the honour of dwarves, wizards, and all such folk as ever passed that way;
but he was no longer quite respectable. He was in fact held by all the
hobbits of the neighbourhood to be ‘queer’—except by his nephews and
nieces on the Took side, but even they were not encouraged in their
friendship by their elders.
I am sorry to say he did not mind. He was quite content; and the sound
of the kettle on his hearth was ever after more musical than it had been
even in the quiet days before the Unexpected Party. His sword he hung
over the mantelpiece. His coat of mail was arranged on a stand in the hall
(until he lent it to a Museum). His gold and silver was largely spent in
presents, both useful and extravagant—which to a certain extent accounts
for the affection of his nephews and his nieces. His magic ring he kept a
great secret, for he chiefly used it when unpleasant callers came.
He took to writing poetry and visiting the elves; and though many
shook their heads and touched their foreheads and said “Poor old
Baggins!” and though few believed any of his tales, he remained very
happy to the end of his days, and those were extraordinarily long.
One autumn evening some years afterwards Bilbo was sitting in his study
writing his memoirs—he thought of calling them “There and Back Again,
a Hobbit’s Holiday”—when there was a ring at the door. It was Gandalf
and a dwarf; and the dwarf was actually Balin.
“Come in! Come in!” said Bilbo, and soon they were settled in chairs
by the fire. If Balin noticed that Mr. Baggins’ waistcoat was more
extensive (and had real gold buttons), Bilbo also noticed that Balin’s beard
was several inches longer, and his jewelled belt was of great magnificence.
They fell to talking of their times together, of course, and Bilbo asked
how things were going in the lands of the Mountain. It seemed they were
going very well. Bard had rebuilt the town in Dale and men had gathered
to him from the Lake and from South and West, and all the valley had
become tilled again and rich, and the desolation was now filled with birds
and blossoms in spring and fruit and feasting in autumn. And Lake-town
was refounded and was more prosperous than ever, and much wealth went
up and down the Running River; and there was friendship in those parts
between elves and dwarves and men.
The Hall at Bag-End Residence of B.Baggins Esquire
The old Master had come to a bad end. Bard had given him much gold
for the help of the Lake-people, but being of the kind that easily catches
such disease he fell under the dragon-sickness, and took most of the gold
and fled with it, and died of starvation in the Waste, deserted by his
companions.
“The new Master is of wiser kind,” said Balin, “and very popular, for,
of course, he gets most of the credit for the present prosperity. They are
making songs which say that in his day the rivers run with gold.”
“Then the prophecies of the old songs have turned out to be true, after a
fashion!” said Bilbo.
“Of course!” said Gandalf. “And why should not they prove true?
Surely you don’t disbelieve the prophecies, because you had a hand in
bringing them about yourself? You don’t really suppose, do you, that all
your adventures and escapes were managed by mere luck, just for your
sole bene-fit? You are a very fine person, Mr. Baggins, and I am very fond
of you; but you are only quite a little fellow in a wide world after all!”
“Thank goodness!” said Bilbo laughing, and handed him the tobacco-
jar.
tree
treee
treee
treeeee
tree
treee
treeeeeeee
tree
treee
treee
treeeee
tree
treee
treeeeeeeeree
treee
treee
treeeee
tree
treee
treeeeeeee
tree
tree
tree
treee
treee
treeeee
tree
treee
treeeeeeee
tree
treee
treee
treeeee
tree
treee
treeeeeeeeree
treee
treee
treeeee
tree
treee
treeeeeeee
treee
treee
treeeee
tree
treee
treeeeeeee
tree
treee
treee
treeeee
tree
treee
treeeeeeeeree
treee
treee
treeeee
tree
treee
treeeeeeee
treee
treee
treeeee
tree
treee
treeeeeeee
tree
treee
treee
treeeee
tree
treee
treeeeeeeeree
treee
treee
treeeee
tree
treee
treeeeeeee
